I got this book for Christmas and really wanted to like it, but the main character, Stephanie, is such a snippy, old-fashioned, unsympathetic nerve saw that I was happy when I read it out and was able to put it on the shelf.
Words are separated completely arbitrarily, line breaks are also a disaster. In this form virtually unreadable, less formatted than any simple text file. I complained to Amazon, never got an update, even on the Paperwhite still as bad as years ago on the previous Kindles.
Just annoying!
Not so good!  I've read much better!
A chat of a semi-educated fascist. It is incomprehensible. How could an entire nation then fall into this primitive swearing-in?
In view of the daily violence in our society, a flat work without literary value, with thin plot, which is only puffed up with disgusting violent scenes. Not recommended.
I was waiting for a good ending, but there was none. The book simply ended without clarifying anything. Too bad about the time. 
Who doesn't know the feeling: You torment yourself by a multi-hundred-page waltz driven by the idea of being able to complete it as soon as possible. It is usually a non-fiction book whose information is believed to have been taken. Well, you think, in the end you are richer with knowledge and the effort pays off.
Buying this book was a waste of money. The models are boring, square bags through the bench, without any style or esprit. The cut-outs are mostly very unflattering wide round collars, it is not taken off or increased, which makes you simply produce straight down hanging parts, and the majority of the patterns are extremely ugly vests. Anyone who has ever bought a Diana or similar for large sizes already knows all this. Interesting also the note after each piece: do not block! And that's what the finished models look like...
Bored story, written in an unsightly writing style.
The book is chasing a claim it never achieves.
Unfortunately, this book, like almost all of Mr Gambordella's works, is not recommended. It is downright dangerous, because most techniques are simply not to be used. It would be better if the man were looking for another hobby.
So I haven't read anything like this superficially written for a long time. The author uses all common clichés in his characters and the ending is a real joke. It is suitable for a screenplay for a soap opera of the evening program. Terrible!
A soooo badly written book is almost a work of art. Bad German, false verbs, everything about cappucino and espresso - who drinks what of it and how much of it. Repetitive to the go no longer. The story might be good, but it has an embarrassment that made me even more acidic. Too bad for the few euros.
Knight Kurz von Knapp, Mrs. Gundula von Ganz-Genau, Ritter Brett vorm Kopf, Ritter Gross von Kotz, Einhorn Ernst, Princess Piep, Miss Huch.... and even more of such superfluous names, which only distract and make the book seem annoying. My son likes it, but only because it's about knights. Will look for another knight's book.
I haven't read such a pointless, empty book for a long time, just thrown away money.
The main character is actually just like a defiant toddler, shallow plot and the rest is just disgusting. Who cares where Helen disposes of her homemade tampons and chews her dried menstrual blood under her fingernails. It's a bestseller???????
Actually quite idiotic. Don't understand why everyone loves this book so much.
This birthday calendar uses stolen pictures. The real author of the pictures is Ciro Marchetti. Don't buy!
What a pity! As a biotechnologist I am deeply disappointed, as a reader bored .... Have given up in half, a pity: big topic in multi-writer manner forgot ...
I wondered all the time during the reading why this book was written.
It's hard to believe what bestial thoughts become, it's just cruel and disgusting.
Poorly and barely readable printed, confusing. Simple: useless!
Tearful title and very little behind it. I am not a woman, but I assume that every woman knows this information, which is described in this booklet. Here you will get the impression, as with most books that deal with this topic: Read this book and you can have anyone. The interpersonal behaviour regarding relationships is already somewhat more complex. This booklet is simply to be understood as motivation or as a reminder. The topics are probably in every two months in every women's magazine. And you can have that for less money.
Without intending to read even a sentence from the paranoid effusions of this whimsical person, I seriously think about securing a whole shipload of this work! In the near future, this book will be very valuable as a document of the times of a sadly shameful German past! 256 pages authorized hate-speech! If the laws he himself are consistently enacted, this should be sufficient, at least for a lifetime of driving licence scarcity!
Underground!
A book written by an extremely incompetent politician and lawyer.
Even the reading sample gives an idea: just exaggerated crap, which he gives of himself. I had to laugh as he described how he was chased by a rally. The video on YouTube outed him as a blender.
As an additional learning material for my German course I bought this book. The vocabulary is rich, but the story is quite boring. It consists of senseless events that gave me the impression that the writer had lost the thread and only superficially edited the characters.
Absolutely unscientific and not written by an expert.
Sledbel scrap in pure form. Great for all conspiracy myth believers, otherwise at most to be used as a ignition material for the furnace.
Unfortunately, I am not convinced at all. Acts like cheap pseudoscience. I was dazzled by the many positive reviews. If you want to learn about habits, take a look at Tiny Habits by BJ Fogg.
I can't recommend it, it hasn't done me well without professional support to do root cause research and dig in my past. Certainly ok, if you're fine. It didn't help me at all and it has something "unprofessional" for me...
Unfortunately, the book was so badly bound that after taking two things in hand, the bond dissolved.
The book has unfortunately arrived damaged, see photo.
I read about 20 pages and then sold the book on. It reads totally badly and is totally banal and superficially written. I like to read, but I just couldn't "get in" with this book. I was quickly bored because the same thing was said over and over again.
The content has been drawn far too long and it is just exhausting to read in the long run. The terms "sun child" and "shadow child" hang out to my ears after this book. In terms of content, nothing that will help you. I bought it because I was hoping to learn about the human psyche; unfortunately a total mishandling ...
Did not work via audible. What a pity
nothing at all for my taste.
Reads like a children's book with the motto "The Otto is now gaaaanz angry and the Lisa doesn't understand why..." Felt i was scared while reading and sold for stupid.
I don't think the book is really good. I don't like the spelling. I'm in the middle of the book and I don't really want to read it, but I'll read it to the end. Unfortunately, I promised myself more of it after reading the reviews.
Author blames parents for any negative trait. I absolutely do not understand the positive evaluation of this book. Instead of sometimes being critical of oneself, others seek guilt. Quite a terrible book, which is also absolutely irresponsible to me.
Confusing and misleading. I didn't want to download a subscription, now I accidentally pressed OK and already I have a contract with audible.
Perhaps I expected too much because it was so much praised, but I am disappointed. The dialogues were like chewing gum and you can actually summarize the essence with a few sentences. It makes you think, but it's not "enlightening" now if you've dealt with the subject before.
Unfortunately, I can only explain the good overall rating in such a way that many have joined the hype around this book. Unfortunately for me, this is quite undeserved. The book is written extremely simple and scratches only on the surface. The content is quite flat and at the end of the book you don't know how before. Quite a disappointment.
Linguistically very simple to naively written, content flat.
Based on the reviews and the short description, I expected more. Honestly, I'm disappointed. The book never captivated me and so I couldn't even read it until the end. The philosophical treatises are wisdoms of life that basically everyone knows.
As if you hadn't read it before ... I only read it to have something from the "bestseller list" ready to talk to people who consume normal literature. It's nice and every now and then you need your mindset, but you don't really find new insights there.
The best is the pretty cover and the inviting title. But don't keep what he promises. Essence of the book: If you don't have a buck on your job, do something else.
Totally boring from the back to the front. With difficulty reading the last pages always with the hope that something exciting happens or that there is still a meaningful end ... Vain.
I only read the book because someone told me the story of the fisherman and I found it nice. Unfortunately, the story is not the author at all and the book is written really badly. All-known wisdoms of life are packed into bulky dialogues with a very conceptual stupid questioner. The figures are more than pale. I haven't had a book in my hand for a long time that was so well rated and so badly written.
I was expecting an interesting story with depth as described. Unfortunately, I was disappointed. It is a life counselling book - also in places very long-winded . Neither from writing to the dialogues or the characters, nor from the depth seof that one learns "new" (and has not read 100 times), so that one could overlook weaknesses of the story. What a pity.
It's interesting that the book has received such good reviews. I found the book more than boring, but I read it to the end in the hope that it would become even more exciting, which was absolutely not the case. It is long-winded and meaningfully written. Too bad for time and money.
Rarely do I write a review, in this case: the book is not recommended, unfortunately can not understand the 5 star reviews at all. It is quickly read and a question remains: "How could the book have been so successful?" Maybe I'm age-related (32) for such hams no longer available. To all with high expectations, let it stay! My recommendation for readers who want to add more knowledge to your life, I recommend the Hagakure, or the Far Eastern classics in general. Lots of knowledge for little money.
I had ordered the book because so many were excited about it. But what can I say? This is clearly only for people who also stick "carpe diem" wall decals into the apartment. Truisms, flat American recited.
Due to the hype and the recommendations, my expectations were probably far too high. I always thought I hadn't understood something properly, but then I was happy to read some critical reviews that confirmed my opinion. The findings to be brought closer in this book are simply too banal for reasonably reflected and open people with reason. This could all be on one A4 page. Too, the writing style is more reminiscent of a mediocre student essay than a bestseller. Unfortunately, I really can't recommend this book.
If the content of this "writing" is the expression of what the author understood of the "sense of life", then he could have spared himself the trouble of making this one realization, namely that everyone should do what he feels called to do on 128 pages in a more than bad story.
So unfortunately the book didn't convince me. I bought it because of the good reviews, but it didn't appeal to me. It's not really profound ... there are some good lines here and there, but it doesn't pull me along. What a pity.
Boringly written, stupid stuff. Far from reality and truth! I don't even want to give it away, so I threw it in the bin.
Since several acquaintances recommended the book to me, I was disappointed to be presented with the quite charming philosophy of life in such a shallow, long-breathed and repetitive style. As if one could not remember 3 questions, here as is doced by American teleevangelists incl. self-congratulation a la "What a great anecdote". For a book that fights against the waste of life, it's terrifyingly bloated!
The book is thin, read quickly and the content can be summarized in two sentences. At the end of the day, you have to think about what you really want from life and act on it. That's it. I can't understand the hype around this book, which also led me to buy.
Terrifying that such a book has such enormous success ... One is extremely anxious to appear profound and is completely superficial and the little content completely trivial. The real issue offers enough potential. The writing style fits the work and is also without any claim. Luckily, you're through with it in an hour.
I absolutely can't understand the hype around this book. For me, it is quite meaningless and absolutely not poignant - in no direction.
It's a mystery to me why this book has landed on the bestseller lists. Rarely have I been as annoyed about buying a book as I have been about it. I can only agree with the negative reviews.
The content is banal and also not well written.
This book is nonsense, is not worth reading. Why it made it to the bestseller is a mystery to me, perhaps by those like me, who are tempted to buy by targeted propaganda. With money you can finance advertising and by advertising you can even bring pointless scrap to the man/woman. I should have thrown this book into the bin after 5 pages. Pure sandbox philosophy.
I haven't read such a stupid book in a long time. Written by someone who obviously thinks his path is the only true one, for gullible and unreflective people who are dissatisfied with their lives and want confirmation. Each not entirely simple thought is explained again simplified over 1.5 pages and the sentence structure does not become more complex than two consecutive relative clauses. Absolutely not recommended, read it in 2h and not enjoyed a minute.
A very superficial book. It absolutely did not touch my soul and did not meet my expectations. I also didn't like the writing style in constant flat dialogues. Unfortunately, for me, it is a disappointment.
How such a schund could become a bestseller is a mystery to me. This book is really thin and should be read quite quickly. I didn't make it to the end because I kept putting it away because of boredom and bad style ... Now it has its unread existence on the shelf and is allowed to yellow there until it is yellow. Ciao.
Disappointing and shallow. The solution is not presented, one waits until the end of the book in vain. A nice children's book story, but not useful for real life. What is the fisherman supposed to finance his electricity, life for the children, clothes, house, etc. if he does not sell his fish. Just nonsense. I can't imagine that the author is really serious about this, otherwise you can only grab your forehead and hold a sad, inner monologue. Too bad, I expected more.
Just superficial. It didn't touch me.
The book is far too flat, too constructed, too super-teacher-like for me.
Always the same lyre, nothing new and quite boring. I also think that this book does not really convey reality.
Too bad it sounded interesting ... Very long-winded, boring. I give every book a chance, but I couldn't read it.
Honestly.... a very shallow story about the meaning of our life, but which obviously finds a lot of appeal. The booklet is certainly suitable for seekers at the beginning of their journey, didactically well constructed with a catchy imagery provided ...
Boring... Just quote the short story of Heinrich Böll, with a lot of gelaber around it. Every single one of us knows what is written in the book ...
I can't say anything about the book itself (not yet read to the end), but it's annoying and a pity if the book arrives damaged... There is no ecological relation to the price - but perhaps a different packaging size should be taken here.
I know the book about it and was very much looking forward to the audiobook. I was disappointed because it was spoken too quickly and indistinctly in many passages. I didn't even hear it to the end. What a pity.
Well, you could have saved that. The story is still going on - but the speaker should listen to himself. Not to be recommended, unfortunately, a pity for the money.
No, it's not worth it. At best for people who haven't dealt with their lives at all. And those who feel the desire should reach for other masters. Narrow work for relatively much money. Abstruse story based on American knitting pattern. Where do only the positive reviews come from? Very enigmatic.
At best for someone who has never thought about life, to read quite nicely. Otherwise trivial messages, wrapped in a trivial story.
A bestseller that is widely read. I know. But the book gave me little. To me it seems rather artificial, quite old-school and tips with a short range.
Unfortunately, I cannot agree with the recommendations! Book is boring ...
Wasted money, wasted time. The book is not only poorly written, but also incomprehensibly flat in content.
I found it boring to yawn.
Very bad book. Don't understand how everyone likes this book or how it can change a life.
Rarely had such bad literature in his hands.
Rarely has something bad in his hand. Honestly, i.e. don't even read it ready.
Unfortunately, the book is very superficial and sometimes extremely trivial. The whole thing seems very much inspired by philosophers from antiquity. Unfortunately not highly recommended.
What has gone wrong here? The book reads as if written by a primary school student. The philosophical ulterior motives are flatly formulated and choppy. Sorry, I can't recommend it.
Too high your own expectations. It was tough and boring and I'm happy to start with my new book soon ...
Don't meet my taste! Very boringly written.
No idea why it received so much positive reviews.
Nothing new in this book, I should have bought something else. Boring and not particularly well written. 
Deeply boring.
Unfortunately, very shallow reading. After about 40 pages put away again.
Total plump ...
It didn't meet my expectations. Boring.
As already mentioned by other readers, there is nothing new here. I would only recommend it to very young readers who are just starting to wonder what they want to make of their lives. Unfortunately, the book is actually too long-winded for this and the narrative style - for me - very annoying. I never found it funny.
All ancient wisdoms that have already been warmed up several times and can be read elsewhere in a similar form. Definitely nothing new. Very disappointing ...
At breakfast in the evening (correctly read) in a "café" until dawn, have conversations of a semi-philosophical nature and then continue the journey the next morning with new insights for life? Oh woe!
I can only agree with the previous speakers: very flat, linguistic and extremely boring in terms of content. I am very disappointed!
Actually, everything has already been said, but somehow I feel the need to make a comment. There is nothing about this book that makes it really worth reading. The story is just banal and incredibly constructed. The banality then continues consistently in the wisdom scares about the meaning of life.
The book may bring something new for children, and the form and style are so infantile that I have tormented myself to the end. Esotericism for the less gifted.
I have already read some guides on the meaning of life, but I really have to say that this little 100-page book is absolutely not worth the money! According to the author, everything is much better if you answer the following 3 questions for yourself: Why are you here? Are you afraid of death? Do you have a full life? I really find it pointless to reduce life to these issues. Moreover, it is probably not the case that you are only on the right track if it is easy. But I do not want to discuss the content of the book here, just to suggest to everyone that what is written in this book has been heard by everyone before and that there are much better things that can be bought for EUR 10. So true to the author:... don't spend money on something you don't really need!
What a pity! Endless repetitions, very, very poor in terms of language and content. I was annoyed and very surprised how such a book can get on the bestseller list!?
I didn't get out over half of the book and found it just barren. Maybe I'm not ready for the message, but all the time I've been waiting for it to finally get exciting or interesting. Instead, page-by-side dialogues and the 'purpose of existence'. Not mine.
Very disappointing to me because it is very superficial. I couldn't learn anything from it. Maybe a good purchase if you deal with philosophy for the first time, but for more the whole thing is not enough.
I shall be brief, as other reviewers are already travelling in great detail. I, too, find the book frighteningly bad, and the authors, whether the stilted expression and the silly, set-up-looking story, are excessively untalented. As a good alternative, I recommend Robert Wringham: I'm out.
After the many good reviews I was very disappointed with the book. It is a collection of commonplaces.
Unfortunately, I can't understand the hype around this book. I read it and got annoyed, why can't I say exactly? Maybe it's just too easy and esoteric for me. Everything goes according to the motto: You can get everything you want. The atmosphere and scenery didn't appeal to me either. What a pity!
Anyone who has ever spent even ten minutes in their lives wondering what the meaning of life might be does not need this book. Whether or not he has found an answer in those ten minutes.
Got me tempted by the flap text to buy the book. The writing style is flat, feels like an adult is explaining being to a child. I can't understand the hype surrounding the book. Completely disappointing and nothing new in terms of content.
Had acquired the book because of the long-lasting prominent position in the bookstore - and because I thought it might be interesting.
Rarely have I been so disappointed. In terms of content and language, extremely flat, lots of "Blabla" and meaningless passages. It is one of the very few books i have disposed of after reading it in the paper bin. It is inexplicable to me how the book was able to achieve these sales figures in this country. Would not give a star if possible.
The book is neither literary nor philosophical. The subject in itself offers potential, but it is made in the typical American superficial way. Didn't inspire me at all.
Isn't worth the hype! Such a dry book, I had to pull myself together to read it to the end. It's about three people who have a monologue about the meaning of life in a café. If some people might think, the questions are asked as life goes on anyway.
I haven't read such a boring non-meaning book in a bad style for a long time. If you get involved in a fairy tale lesson, it should at least be magically written. Unfortunately, misreporting!
Since I have stumbled across this book so many times, I have decided to read it. In the end, I was glad to have bought it secondhand, because it's not particularly captivating, absolutely predictable and really inconsequential. It is completely incomprehensible why this book has become such a bestseller!
Linguistically, this book does not exactly shine through elegance and style. The wisdom is rather truisms and the best thing about this work is the title and the brevity of the narrative. I really don't know how this penny novel could become a bestseller. My recommendation: Buy something else for the money ...
Not particularly new findings that have not been known for a long time. Packed into a rather boring frame story. Unfortunately too trivial. And the price is many times too high for that. What a pity.
Once again, a prime example of how rankings can influence people. This book is so flat that you're annoyed to have jumped on this staged hype. I wonder how it is always possible to push up such lame literature by whom or whatever. With so many ingenious works waiting for their readers, in the haze of oblivion. Just a pity.
The position on the Mirror's bestseller list prompted me to buy. The booklet is rather annoying than stimulating and misses the hoped-for depth. money and life time.
Absolutely simple written. No moving statement. Let's see how cold soup tastes. Perhaps it is still quite interesting for 12 to 15-year-olds, as a contrast to the turbulent school life. In any case, I have fallen asleep often enough with the reading.
Superficial, predictable, banal, boring, meaningless, very American. Got the book as a gift and disposed of it directly after reading it.
The book tells virtually no story at all. What it contains in "life counseling" is not filled with life actually lived. Such a thin ribbon, but even the little time you spend reading is completely wasted.
Admittedly, after the voices in the press and the ratings here, my expectations were high. I quickly became disillusioned and still tormented myself until just before the end. Unfortunately, the reader has to explain everything and did you know that money does not make you happy? If not, then absolutely read.
Boring. Repeats again and again and revolves around three questions. Anyone who knows to some extent what he expects from life and the life of him does not need this book.
This story started really well ... Unfortunately, it became so boring that I had to put the book away. And that means something, because I haven't read 3 books in the past few years ... The book doesn't really deserve a single star!
The book is based on the short story by Heinrich Böll " Anecdote for the Reduction of Work Morale", did the publisher not notice this? There is no mention of this short story in the book, it is actually called spiritual theft. But obviously you can make money from it now.
Bad, bad, bad! Written in an absolutely bad style, a book that wants to make some lucky formulas with the Holzhammer method. Creepy! But that's a matter of taste.
This booklet was a single great disappointment for me. I cannot understand how two or more stars can be awarded here. Writing style and content are both at a horribly low level. Who expects something like the alchemist or similar: fingers off! The book is not worth a penny.
Long-winded and meaningless, no idea how the booklet could become a bestseller. Got it as a gift, it excites me rather than excites me.
I absolutely can't recommend the book. The only 1-2 anecdotes worth reading could have been summarized on 5 pages. The rest is just boring in-cafe seats and chatter. Unfortunately, it is a waste of time.
I put the book away after half. One must have led a completely unreflective and meaningless life in order to be blown away by the "knowledge" of the protagonist.
Conspired tried to provide life support. Embarrassingly stupid amateur psychology awkwardly brought into a banal literary form.
The book is poorly written and has little content. You can see that the author is a personality coach. Absolutely not recommended the book.
I've never read such a banal book that somehow made it a bestseller. Too bad about the time.
Linguistically clearly presented commonplaces, which are clear to everyone anyway, implausibly packed into a flat plot and ultimately only advertising for the author, who happens to be a personality trainer. Annoying.
This book is obviously not written by a professional author. The story is not there, the narrative is extremely clumsy. There is absolutely nothing subtle about this book. Not even the intention behind the book to promote his life coaching package.
One of the worst books I've ever read. The writing style is underground and the same question is repeated again and again. If it were possible, I wouldn't even give the one star.
A simple, predictable story with no depth and linguistically truly at the level of an average seventh-grader. I can't understand the positive reviews. 1 point is there for the actually really good idea, which was then mercilessly put in the sand.
The contents of the book can also be summarized on one page. Absolutely meaningless ... Had ordered me all the books in this series with anticipation, but all are totally boring and meaningless. Honestly, don't understand the hype.
Incredibly banal self-realization advice with the wooden hammer method. I am sorry for the people who come to conclusions with this book.
Worst self-optimization skit. If you can seriously stay alert to the audiobook, you've already achieved a lot. It serves me at least as a sleep aid. For the other, this is no good.
Boring, poorly written (or poorly translated) and a succession of calendar sayings - unfortunately a waste of time! The whole thing could also have been summarized on one side: Think about what the meaning of life is for you and then act accordingly and with fun... Uah.
Horribly boring book, writing style a disaster. I forced myself to read the book because it was a mirror bestseller and I was constantly waiting for it to become more interesting. Zero inspiring and not worth a penny.
Due to the many positive reviews, I was guided to the purchase. After about half of the book, however, disillusionment followed. In this book, little is learned about the meaning of life. Draught misreporting!
Before buying the book I should have read one or the other review here on Amazon ... and instead of the book, I'd rather have a coffee!
A nice little book for "beginners" who want to deal with the topic. No new insights for life-experienced readers. Why such a book is on a bestseller list is eludes my logic.
I could have saved the money!!! I haven't had such an uninteresting book for a long time!!
Very thin content. The story itself is just tiring.
Absolutely superficial and cheap. Rarely read such a crap. Which sect deserves here? Isn't worth his money in the beginning.
About as profound as a wall tattoo with the inscription "Don't dream your life, but live your dream".
Philosophy for beginners. Banal, inconsequential, clichéd, predictable, American, boring. Often the mere fact that it is a mirror bestseller is an indication of averageness.
Rarely have you read such a bad story.
The ingredients list of a cereal pack is more substantial than this "book". Poetry album wisdom for adults without imagination.
God was the flat! If you want content and depth, it is best to read challenging literature on challenging topics ... here we have wannabe philosophy at picture newspaper level.
This book is a small guide packed in 100 pages, but this book could just as well have been summarized in 3 pages. Too bad - wasting time!
A bad book. Better for the money to go to eat ice cream!
The greatest nonsense I've ever read. Just boring.
You can also read any "thoughtful quotes" about life on one of Facebook's many pages.
Luckily, this book was read quickly. If you are interested in the subject, there is nothing new for you. Something written together by everything, the language wooden, nonsensically nested sentences, the story absolutely uninteresting. For me, the book is just annoying "seminar reading" and the only thing I will remember is the sympathetic sea turtle and that the protagonist John has definitely eaten too much. I would like to delete the one star.
Disused truisms packaged in a shallow, trivial story. I would rather recommend people who still learn their lessons from this literary publication, which is still extremely weak.
Absolutely banal and predictable. There are so many good books on the meaning of life, this is not one of them.
Rarely has such a stupid book been read, so banal. Everything in it is well known. Incredibly, you can make money with such crap.
What I really felt after reading this book is my wasted time! I have rarely read such a poorly written, banal book with a shallow statement and narrative weaknesses. Take the characters of the coffee staff. You speak in the semantics of university professors. Implausible. The one message "Why are you here" is moved back and forth to fatigue without gaining substance. Very sad.
Can't understand the good rating. That's pretty shallow food.
Not humorous, not touching. Just pure boredom with flat wisdom on 127 sides. Waste of time and money. I'm annoyed.
The worst book I've read in a long time.
Absolutely no depth, i wonder why the book is so hyped.
Trivial. Unfortunately, neither an enrichment of the spiritual horizon nor a reading pleasure. Milk can philosphie.
The book was probably written in the fourth grade. Unbearably bad.
Unfortunately, I found this book completely irrelevant (and yes, I quite understood what the author wanted to tell me). The only good thing about this book is its brevity, it was read through in an hour.
The book reads very tough and I folded it after half and didn't read it any further.
Cute sweet story, but too little content. Not worth reading for me.
I read the book on recommendation and therefore expected more. All the while I wondered in which healing world the author lives.
Ancient wisdomof life, presented to justify the uncompromising self-realization of the upper 10000. Rarely has a book made me so aggressive. I seriously wonder how so many people can gain anything from this book.
This book is written so flat and banal, with constant repetitions, I am unclear from what low level of education and experience the reader is assumed. I can only recommend reading this book - anything you do instead in the time you've won brings you closer to the meaning of life than this book.
Bored to death. Things I've heard and read a thousand times.
Twenty euros that could have been better done. Waste of paper. It is a pity that trees had to be cut down for this.
The author quickly reveals that he has little idea of AI. In order to discuss whether AI can compete with humans, or whether AI is not dangerous, etc., one should also deal with AI scientifically. Real scientists (computer scientists, neurobiologists, etc.) are already philosophizing about AI and much better. Philosophers with no idea about the subject should stay away from it! My opinion as a bioinformatician.
A collection of unproven claims about what humans and evolution are and what distinguishes them from artificial intelligence. No clear definition of artificial intelligence, so generalizing that it is painful to read or hear all of this. Mixed with opinions on why life is valuable.
More luck than anything else. I'm just disappointed that such people want to promise success without a modicum of ability to put something on the line and everything they've done is just based on luck!
I have rarely read such a bad book. The whole book is a dialogue and therefore quite exhausting to read. I didn't really want to read the book to the end.
I didn't make it to the end. The book is very boringly written. It revolves around the circle for a long time. I absolutely do not understand the good reviews. I'm sorry for my money.
Very bad. I read a lot about psychology. I've never bought such a bad book and i was annoyed with my money in hindsight. Unfortunately, due to the positive recessions here.
Unfortunately, I find the book just annoying. Young man says philosopher contradicts, young man says, philosopher contradicts, young man compares Y. Philosopher contradiction and all the time it's about the great eagle. Moreover, the findings/answers are not new. So if you enjoy arguments, just too.
I have it as an audiobook, I am very disappointed with the whole content.
Feels every second sentence begins with a reference to a Harvard University study. Together with the numerous footnotes, this gives the book a pseudo-scientific touch, because there is no real discourse. What gets stuck is that the author likes to eat nuts and thinks it's healthy.
The author has worked hard through many studies, which I find positive. His background knowledge, however, is flawed. Unfortunately, he has therefore incorporated the results into this book unchecked. In another edition, I would like him to check his results for plausibility with the body's biochemistry. Then the compass needles would probably be a little different.
What happens if you summarize all the frozen nutrition studies - known from the relevant women's magazines? A food compass that takes us into the desert.
You can save yourself. Linguistically debauchery and content an infusion of more or less relevant facts, from which the author then draws his own conclusions. A technical and non-fiction book looks different to me.
Typical journalist, so much text around little content. Lots of specialists and high-quality studies and gelabers. The last chapter would have been enough. Too bad for so much paper. It's a real shame.
Not the book as desired and thought, the vivid is missing.
Not recommended for me.
Often 10 lines with the information content are formulated by one. Overall, it is far too digressive, rather than focusing on the key messages. This often makes reading very tedious and has always led me to put the book aside.
The whole book was totally lengthened. There are 320 pages and only on the last 5 pages the whole Rotz was summarized again, which was completely unnecessarily stretched in the first 315 pages. A treat if only 5 pages of 320 are useful in a book and you pay 20 euros for it
Well.
Unfortunately nothing new and unfortunately very Wischiwaschi, falls under: "Nice attempt". Recommended only for those who have never been involved in nutrition.
The author has collected/written off a lot of information together, in my opinion, without his own experience, passed on uncritically.
Old knowledge, nicely packaged. If you're in the subject, you'll find nothing new!
Why is this up so far up in the bestsellers? Returned again, money not worth at all - I wouldn't even take for free ...
Unfortunately, the entire book reveals several printing errors. Pages are duplicated, the pictures do not match the dishes and it jumps from pages 191 and 211, which is missing 20 pages!!!
No good recipes ... Can't really recommend it any further! There are other, better and more varied fitness cookbooks!
The book is great, the recipes are great and taste very tasty. However, I received a circulation with only 207 pages instead of 224 pages.
Not good.
From my point of view, it is not possible!
Another superfluous cookbook that the world doesn't need, from a blogger who has no idea about nutrition science.
Not recommended
There is nothing to say against the recipes, they are quite good. But you don't need this book for that. Many recipes are also easy to find on the Internet and thus virtually free of charge. Accordingly, the purchase is pointless and the book is rather hyped by fans.
Rarely read such a bad book. Also not recommended for the 0815 citizen. Simply take the surface knowledge from certain areas, compare it, although they have no common denominator, and in the end we have the salad. If you really want to read the book, you should do it in English, because the translation has not been very successful either.
Basically it's interesting, but I don't think it makes much sense to stuff everything in such a small book. You are flooded with information. You can't tell the world's history in 30 minutes. Why is the question? Those who are interested in the history of mankind should proceed more according to epochs. Is far too much information in one place. As a teacher, I will not recommend such a book to my students. The superficial knowledge does not remain in the memory for long.
Unpleasant voice.
Unfortunately, it arrived damaged. I think it's a pity.
From my point of view, far too subjectively written and as already mentioned here was partly "unclean" researched. A lot of things are told very long-winded. Definitely no recommendation to buy!
Very superficial, extremely long-winded, very boring, completely overestimated, almost annoying, absolutely superfluous, at best for beginners, all others Jared Diamond is recommended.
The book is interesting and very informative. However, one should obtain the English-language edition. The German translation is not recommended, as for inexplicable reasons the extensive index contained in the English original was completely omitted.
The book is unfortunately in an absolutely unacceptable size ...
The delivery was easy and fast, the format of the book did not work for me and should be noted more clearly! A book that fits in the palm of my hand with its entire size is not pleasant for me to hold and read, because the letters were also smaller than usual. The book declined because of its format.
Pretty boring and unfortunately it didn't help me at all
I can't recommend the book!!
This book describes by and large how to be successful in your career, but not how to make friends in the private sphere. This book was a complete mishandling. I can't understand the good reviews. Most of them will probably be fake.
Unfortunately, the book was very disappointing. I don't want index cards for friends or Create acquaintances to record their dates. Sure, it will work, but whoever you harmonize with will work without manipulation. I find it bad that the book is so praised and so recommended, because I also found it not pleasant to read.
The book consists of 95% long-drawn examples, which is no exaggeration. Are we in a lively fantasy novel? The remaining 5% are then self-evident such as smiles, not arguing ... Aha, very useful.
Dale Carnegie died in 1955 and was influenced by both economic and social influences, which are no longer valid today. "How to make friends" includes - but what still applies to American aid today is still typical of American aid, too many pseudo-examples. I can't recommend this book.
Just bad. The book is strongly reminiscent of these "How to get rich quickly in 5 easy steps" scammers ... So sry!! Smile them, compliment others, call others by name. People are completely different. These tips are simply good behaviour, but I strongly doubt whether one wins "friends" because of this. Bad book, no purchase recommendation.
I am 22 years old. I couldn't identify with the book. The author uses very old examples or stories that did not appeal to me. Get books from today, from younger authors when you're as old as me.
When I received the book, the cover and the first few pages were totally broken. You don't really expect that when you order a new book. Next time you'd rather buy in the bookstore ...
The author writes only about himself as the greatest, best blogger. The book is not suitable as a guide
Little new thoughts. Wisdoms of everyday life that are accessible to everyone with common sense. Large parts only empty filling with no added value.
Our son needs the "Lies mal" booklets for school. It is the schoolbooks that are most unpopular with him, not to say hated. The lyrics are partly illogical and totally boring: painting flags ..., a Flummi flies into space ... Instead, how about sentences on nature & themes such as volcanoes, space or sport.
In my opinion, only rip off bad product description never again!!!!!
Returned. Grease stains on the cover and black fingerprints on the sides!!!
The book had double chapters and some pages were confused, other pages were missing, it had to be re-ordered, unfortunately the error has only now been noticed and the return deadline had passed!
I'm very disappointed, bad crime thriller.
Couldn't laugh once and the plot is neither thrilling nor exciting.
I was tormented, really tormented, through the first 300 pages. I then skipped pages in the hope that things would get better. I've never read such a horribly boring book about her. I'm still annoyed that I didn't put it aside sooner.
This book is very long-winded and an exciting thriller is unfortunately unrecognizable. It's a pity when Charlotte Link's other books are really exciting.
Long-winded, flat, no tension-building. The plot led to a thrilling contemporary thriller (Guernsey connoisseur). Even the descriptions of the place are lagging.
Completely failed book, which comes from Fitzek, is hard to believe. After more than a third of the book, there is no trace of a tension arc, endless anecdotes from the childhood of the main character are told ... Gääähn ... , in addition to a boring writing style that makes reading a torment. That was certainly the last Fitzek!
I must say That I have never read such a boring book by Fitzek. My girlfriend saw it the same way. Well, the next one will definitely get better again.
So I've read better books. Was very disappointed. Very brutal. Too brutal. That's just my taste. I prefer it more refined not so extreme.
I bought the book by mistake and wanted to give it back, of course it wasn't, then I read it through and it was terribly bad. After that I deleted it and of course I didn't get my money back.
FitzEK's worst novel.
Very pulled at the hair and illogical. The first book by Fitzek that I didn't read to the end.
So what was that? I didn't like his last books anymore. In this book I looked halfway to see if I had ordered something wrong. No, I did not, in the end Mr Fitzek came through again. But. I can't recommend it.
All the author's books have been read so far ... unfortunately very disappointed by this. It looks constructed, completely overdone and leaves you confused.
Cheap effect-hating!! The more brutal, the better - unfortunately it doesn't work here. I've been excited about Fitzek books so far. But here he had a few very bad days. After more than half of the book I gave up ...
Sorry, but this is the worst book I've read in recent years. A Fitzek is supposed to be that? Somehow I can't really believe it. Until now, his books have been exciting and always well researched in terms of content. "The Gift," on the other hand, is confused, implausible and boring. Too bad for the wasted time!
I've read some of Fitzek's books, but the many twists and turns have made them confusing, but I found them quite exciting, even though I never wanted to put them on the bookshelf. This book, however, has a nice packaging, an appealing flap text, but absolutely no content. I have tormented myself through the pages in the hope of a better story that did not happen. For me, this was Fitzek's last book, there are far better crime writers. This book was absolutely "no gift", at most a gift for junkies!
So if you didn't have to give a star, I wouldn't have given one for this book. From the beginning, a hair-raising opaque story. Somehow completely beside the track. It wasn't fun, I devoured all the other of his books. What a pity. Didn't even read it to the end and put an end to the agony.
This book was an absolute flop by the great writer Sebastian Fitzek. As much publicity and announcements as were made before, the result was sobering. I've read every book of him, but this one is really the worst and also the most boring. I wouldn't buy it again for that lot of money.
Unnecessarily detailed atrocities depicted coupled with a language in which hardly a metaphor reaches at the end enriched with a ridiculous plot twist - and the new Fitzek is finished ...
Unfortunately, very shallow story with predictable end. I'm used to something better from Fitzek.
This book is unreasonable. We had to read that at school and it was abysmally bad. My condolences to all students who are forced to read this.
Basically, I like to read. Unfortunately, however, it was forced to read this book in class. It does not contain any moments of tension, highlights or captivates you in any other way to read on.
My personal definition of a boring book. It's as incredibly uninteresting as I can't put it into words, but hey, everyone's own. 
Largely contradictory book in which many questions remain unanswered in the end and usually do not get to the point. No purchase recommendation!!!!
If I couldn't forgive a star, I would do it ... long-winded, set up, staged, artificial, implausible, and an end so stupid that one would like to mourn the 379 wasted pages until then. I don't think I've ever read a worse book than this one. An absolute disappointment!
I absolutely didn't like the writing style and the characters. The book is extremely boring and predictable. I can't recommend it.
I cannot understand the positive criticisms at all. I just found the book boring! Only banalities are ranked one after the other.
The people are superficial. It's annoying when teens are reinvented by an adult. The events in the video game are also irrelevant and could have been expanded. Actually, the whole story doesn't make sense, especially the forced love story and the person Victor. I don't understand the hype around the book, totally BS.
I have read many books by the author and I have to say that this has really bored me ... It has pulled like chewing gum ... From page 300 (approx.) it got a little better, because it wasn't always about any game characters ...
Contingency, obscenities and recalcitrances ... Unfortunately, the quality of earlier Fitzek books is hardly any indication. Here you lose at best the appetite, very bad.
Unfortunately for me, it is clearly the worst Fitzek I have read so far.
Not readable without nightmares! Too brutal. Such scenes really do not have to be described down to the last detail! No thanks.
Exciting topic in itself. But many questions remain unresolved at the end. As in other novels by him, one notices that the author wants to come to an end. He leaves behind a perplexed but above all disappointed reader.
When you read an enigmatic story, you always have to fear that the author will dissolve it as a dream or a delusion, making it pointless. This fear has come true for me here. You could make it much more elegant. Where does all the fame come from?
I found it disappointing ... Far too predictable and then with children. No... Not mine ....
A lot of text passages are missing from the book! That's annoying when you read. That's why only one star. Wouldn't buy it anymore.
For me, this book was a single disappointment: inauthentic, chop-up and so full of exaggerated and implausible ideas. For some, this ironic humour seems nice, but here everything just seems wrong to me. I don't buy anything from the man and it's a pity that the basic idea was so dirty.
I have seldom read such a boring book, couldn't find anything good about it, then gave up in the middle and then only read the conclusion, I can't understand what some people like so much about this book. I read a lot, cross-legged, but this book was one of the worst.
Rarely has a book bored me so much, one has thought inwardly, when the author finally gets to the point.
Because of the good reviews I bought the book. However, totally disappointed after a few pages put away again. The writing style is simply horrible, completely overloaded. After a few pages I was so annoyed that I decided to let it be. And I really read a lot, one of the worst books I've ever had in my hand. Too bad for the money.
Even 1 point is too much! If only I had read the reviews before the purchase! I could repeat all the negatives that have been said; therefore only: wasting time and money.
The CD is defective and therefore not usable, at the beginning the CD is still okay, but from the halfway time they can only receive noise.
The book is unimaginative and long-winded. The author serves all the clichés of the genre, does not risk his own image. It is as if Eric Emmanuel-Schmitt had written off Michael Ende.
Worst audiobook in a long time, it is more reminiscent of cheap unreal mystery kitsch, completely unrealistic ... Convoluted, long-winded-plate story without a red thread, tension equals NULL. Speakers seem like laypeople. Overall pure waste of time and money, such "machwerke" are superfluous ...
I've never read a book so long. It's very boringly written. The book that has been so touted is poorly written, without esprit.
I had received the book as a gift. Rarely have I read such a superficial book, which does not convey any deeper insights. I had the impression that it was written only to increase wealth. Wasted reading lessons. Unfortunately.
It's very boring written ... The childhood memories drag on and are not excitingly written ...
I couldn't take anything away from the autobiography and found it deeply superficial and boring.
Got the book as a gift for Christmas. Unfortunately, it does not appeal to me. It's rather bland and long-winded, I had to put the book away after the first half. I'd rather read something about Michael Ende than some dry celebrity biographies.
Absolute fall out, the book has no 100 pages and no added value, the price-performance ratio is not right at all.
Unfortunately, a completely loveless book without any graphic preparation. Content is a series of definitions. Pure money-making. Just like the audiobook, which I also bought unfortunately.
Very poorly translated! Very many spelling mistakes and letters forgotten. Quality insufficient! I'll send it back.
Unfortunately, the book did not convince me.
Don't like it - just inconsequential information.
The book is riddled with spelling mistakes - for me, the book disqualifies itself by doing so. The various investment opportunities are discussed in short paragraphs, but a lot of information and a plan for oneself cannot be deduced from this. Halfway through, I took the book to the flea market. Pointless.
The book is general and I don't feel smarter than before. This could have been read on Wikipedia. No examples are mentioned at all.
I'm reading right now. Up to page 9 I have found several spelling errors. Whoever writes "stock" as "file" or "price" as a curve (which is not wrong per se), deserves little confidence when it comes to my best. Sorry. As far as the competence of the book is concerned, I may not judge, but competence goes hand in hand with the appearance. This is missing here.
I had ordered this cookbook to get suggestions on how to make my low carb lunch more varied for the office. Unfortunately, it was a complete mishandling. The book does not contain a single recipe image. Just simply written recipes. So nothing to get ideas. What a pity. The book goes back.
Disappointing!! Nutrition plan with incorrect page information. Recipes not to be found. Expensive ingredients that are sometimes not available on the market.
Unfortunately, the recipes are not made quickly, so they are not suitable for professionals. Often a lot of preparation is necessary and some ingredients are not available in the normal supermarket. Give that back.
I didn't like the book at all. The recipes are difficult to cook and anything but fast.
Just sadly designed, all black and white. Three recipes on one page. No recommendation.
The purchase was totally unnecessary. Recipes are not to be used - many not even low carb. Get me something else.
Especially now that summer is coming, you want to lose weight. Well, what can I say? Recipes are not to be used. Just bad. 1 star is still kind.
Unfortunately, when the book arrived, I realized that the recipes are without pictures. Therefore, I can think of little among the recipes. Furthermore, the recipes require a lot of ingredients in smaller quantities, not for the stressed professionals, with little time. I'm super disappointed. For me, it's a case for the trash can.
A diet should always be appealing. Especially if you want to lose weight, as the fight to lose a few pounds is quite hard. The book is not appealing and has no good recipes.
Disappointingly, the book had bought due to the positive reviews, no pictures, much unnecessary information. Miserable.
As a cookbook, I don't like it. Has not been made appealing.
Cheap paper, no real colour printing. Book goes into the garbage.
The cookbook has no pictures. Not appealing.
The book is the worst cookbook I've ever ordered. Wouldn't give it away either.
A lot of scientific information regarding the diet and one reads and reads to finally get on the right diet for the flat belly ... but it doesn't come, disappointing.
Very badly, I promised more. It's not worth the money.
Unfortunately, the content does not keep what the publisher's product description promises. It is a list of generally available information on various "diets". The presentation is very superficial.
Unfortunately unhelpful. Therefore not recommended. Too bad the titles promised insights that were not yet available ... But I didn't discover.
Boringly written nothing new everything, no super tricks as expected, went back.
Not recommended! It is not true that reading this book brings me to a flat stomach!
Total mis-purchase! Only the usual diets are described ...
Difficult to read and the summary of the book is: "Don't be afraid of death". There are one or two paragraphs that are mostly quoted, which are worth reading, but overall I would rather recommend Seneca.
I don't like what's in it.
Unfortunately very disappointing. It's hard to read because it's just way too "dry". Even from the sentences far too exuberant. It is very miserable to get to the point here.
Met my expectations in the smallest way. Book is totally overrated.
Not to recommend that book is not good.
Please do not buy. The publication of such a "book" alone is an imposition for all readers.
The book is incredible crap. Meaningless sayings and without any reference for children.
Beautiful drawings - that's it. For children and areading adults. Boring short texts that don't really say anything. What a pity.
I didn't like the book. I expected more and therefore sent it back.
Had the book given me for my birthday because I am a big fan of the Kangaroo Chronicles and i was impressed by the many good reviews. Unfortunately, I can't get anything out of this book at all, after half I even stopped reading. I miss the witty wit for which the author has become known from his marsupial chronicles.
The idea of critically presenting the future with technical progress is quite good, but the implementation is quite crap! It quickly becomes bland, the humour repeats itself again and again and the story is not so the hammer ... Dear finger away from it!
I was expecting an exciting book and was totally disappointed.
I find the characters very boring and the book simply miserably written in language. Not recommended.
I put this book away after the first pages. The story is certainly interesting and up-to-date - but the writing style is unbearable - laaaangweilig!
I found it absolutely oversubscribed and very little close to reality. A little less scaremongering and it might be a very good book.
No idea why this book is being hyped so much at the moment. A second 1984 is by no means a matter. Much more the story of a young woman who is radicalized by thought-washing. Okay, it plays in today and tomorrow. Still, the plot is relatively flat, quickly transparent and unsurprising. What a pity.
As many have already mentioned here, the book is a disaster. Good topic but so boringly implemented that after only 50 pages you miss the pleasure, which did not get any better towards the end. I regret having bought and read it and would like to have my money back.
Rarely read such a bad novel. The language seems disjointed and the people rarely behave comprehensibly. The subject is also not particularly new or more spectacular.
This book is really one of the most boring series of words I know. After 200 pages I broke off because there is no storyline.
Too bad for the time you spend with this book. Rarely read anything so bad, even if the topic is certainly very topical.
You can't buy bestsellers - I can only warn any seriously interested reader about this waste of money, material, time, etc. I read the book to the end because I hoped it would get better. But it wasn't. Enough readers have already commented on the content ... Conclusion: Better to buy another book!
In my opinion, absolutely no novel! Hardly any action and where is the end? It finally gets exciting on the last pages and then the book/plot breaks off as abruptly as if the author had forgotten the last pages.
Zero stars, if that were to be the way. By far the most boring and long-winded book I've ever been tormented by. I don't know how this book could get a prize. Unbearable the writing style and the constant repetitions. Quite horrible.
It is completely incomprehensible to me how this book could be so "highly cheered". The figures, as many reviewers write, are bloodless, constructed and implausible in their naivety. To bring the novel close to G. Orwell's "1984" is, in my mind, an imposition. I finally read the "Circle" to the end, it was a waste of time. I now wonder which reviewers are still to be relied upon when even such a renowned writer as J. Zeh praises the book, although I doubt that she has read it at all.
After 100 pages of boredom put away. The link to Orwell's 1984 is a lot of numbers too big - who comes up with such comparisons?
I can only join the 1-star evaluators and clearly advise against buying. The story is completely irrelevant. There is nothing visionary about the novel. Anyone who critically deals with the Internet as a medium cannot gain anything new from the idea of a novel and is disappointed.
How can you treat a very interesting topic so boringly. I was hoping for a little suspense until the shot - in vain!
I find the condition of the book unacceptable, even for a low price. Smell as stored in a damp cellar, side condition read like 1000x, partly torn corners, brownish ... Unappetizing.
The story is simply too shallow and very soon obvious what it is all about and who and why the perpetrator is, even if the author tries to send her investigator in the wrong direction to build tension and a twist in the case. Unfortunately, everything is predictable. In addition, there is an investigator who only gets further by constantly using illegal methods or by letting them be used. In addition, a love story within the already unexciting story. This is more about the world of the annoying investigator. Unsuitable for real detectives. What a pity.
Belongs to the thrillers, which consist almost only of dialogue, so that one gets the impression that the book was already written immediately towards a hoped-for TV craze. Therefore, descriptions, characterizations, atmosphere, etc. are not enough.
Sorry, I can't explain how the many positive reviews could be given. That's because I bought it. The book is absolutely undemanding and predictable. You can't be tied up with the main players. What a pity...
The book is unfortunately really boring, I have tormented me up to halfway through in the hope that it will still be good and then give up. Boring plot, sluggish writing style.
Pretty boring, no tension in it. It's like that. A book where you don't have to be there with your head. Tough and boring.
Linguistically unconvincing. Plot rather weak. No really interesting characters. Far too superficial and very stereotypical figures. Unfortunately too weak!
A shallow thriller. Without great tension, action or twists. What a pity!
Very predictable story, the murderer was already clear after a few chapters, bad writing style, maybe I should not have read Anne Cleeve's crime novel before.
I found the story far too predictable and not exciting. Unfortunately, very inconsequential.
I took some approaches to finish reading the book. It was long-winded and not exciting at all and in many ways inconclusive for me. I'm glad I'm through, without any further interest in the author's books.
If you have trouble falling asleep, this is the right place. Unfortunately not well written. The story ok, but the writing style unfortunately not. What a pity. What a pity.
Unfortunately, the book did not convince me at all. I bought it appendix of the good reviews and can't understand it by now. I found the book superficial, without any depth or tension.
This book is one of the worst I've read in recent years. Terrible writing style and the pressing question of how old the author please is. 15? Absolutely not worth reading. What a pity.
Terrible.
Even the flap text is horrible. History pulled by the hair without any claim and peppered with spelling mistakes. Irish Court??? Please!!! But no matter, the work still goes up the charts, like countless works of fake-enemies-billionaire-six-pack-rock-star-cowboy literature. I will never understand why. Oh, right, it's all about one thing. Could have been told on 100 pages.
History certainly has potential, but unfortunately the dialogues are grotesque. And they are full of poor grammar, strange language and a peculiar choice of words. I don't know if the translation is so bad, or if the author wanted to express herself in a particularly chosen way, it definitely went badly wrong. I only read the beginning, after their first night together I was so annoyed by the language that I put the book away.
I struggled to get into the story and I also lacked the tension. The formatting was just horrible and made it difficult to read.
The book went back almost in original packaging, because the cover does not correspond to the representation on Amazon. It was apparently just scanned and copied. All the umlauts were presented as "??"! Just look at the cover, but assume that the mistake runs through the whole book.
The translation is horrible and the suggestive foreword by Herfried Münkler should have been omitted or at least placed as an afterword.
Cheap cover, very thick pages, absolutely bad translation. I returned it and bought the book from the Island Publishing House.
I only flew over the book, but what I had read has nothing to do with our time. It wasn't profound, nor was it learning anything. His views at that time were perhaps appropriate for the time, but absolutely contemptible for the present time.
Really bad not to recommend. The characters don't come over at all, and the stupid music is totally annoying. No drama just snuuse.
As an avid reader of the book and viewers of the film trilogy, I can't recommend this radio play at all, I had to cancel quite early. I can't befriend most voices (e.g. Gandalf too tender, Gollum too loud and aggressive). The texts or language used convey no tension and even less the atmosphere of a fantasy story. The strongly varying volume unfortunately rounds off the bad impression.
I've seen the movies all and I love them. But I still wanted to read the books, because they are usually more profound. But misrepresentation. The book is absolutely boring, bland and without depth. What does it care about, what Bella cooks or if the Internet line is slow? As I read, I repeatedly distracted myself. This has never happened before.
It's a nice accolade to have written the worst books of the 20th and 21st centuries with this series alongside Dan Brown's Da Vinci Code and the Fifty Shades of Grey. And it shows one thing above all. Success has nothing to do with talent, as long as readers (or something similar to readers) find themselves even more stupid than the author.
One of the most boring books ever. Yes they love each other, yes he is dangerous ... My God how often? Some teens might be on it, but even my 12-year-old daughter is too bored with this "work" vieieiel. We cannot understand this success ... Actually, we're on vampire stories, but this book is at best a sleep era ...
I haven't had such a boring, clichéd book in my hand for a long time. I gave it up after 150 pages, the time was too bad for such a nonsense. I find it sad that you can make bestsellers with such stories. How low does the level actually have to fall? Sophisticated literature is no longer in demand. Everything floats on the shallow wave, just don't think. Very bad.
This book is just bad. The story is boring and nothing actually happens. The protagonist is very unsympathetic. Edward looks like a toddler and the love story is extremely superficial. I wouldn't even recommend this book to a young person. I have often caught not following the book and have wandered off with my thoughts. Zero purchase recommendation!!
I've been slowly getting through to the middle of the book and I'm still waiting for something to happen! History has no plot at all. I cannot understand why such a trara is being made around this book and its filming. Absolutely incomprehensible.
Incredibly, such a book can stay on a bestseller list for weeks. That's penny-high for girlies.
The version has been shortened. It is also poorly read in parts. Cheap product, then. Anyone who has read the book can avoid the disappointment. I would like Amazon to distinguish between shortened and unabridged audiobooks and to be informed as a customer.
This book is the most imaginative i've ever come to. The author has only swapped names and genders and rewrote Twilight. It has not even changed gender characteristics, which makes everything even more implausible. Pure moneymaking!!! Not worth reading!!!!
Unfortunately, I let myself be caught by the good reviews, which I cannot understand. The book is far too long and also too heavy for the very thin factual content. Countless repetitions, again and again the same references, page-by-page redundancies. The actual content can be summarized in this way: drink a smoothie of bananas, blueberries and cherries in the morning, eat less and less fat, drink green smoothies. Omit everything artificial. I haven't been as annoyed about a book purchase as I have been about this one for a long time.
A very boring book to read!
Incredible what can be sold! The author is a medical layman and as a critical reader you can immediately notice this. According to his own information, he gets his information from a spirit from the future!!! Even after a short review, fundamental errors can be found.
Unfortunately, the book has arrived here damaged. If you prefer to buy the book in the store, you won't get a broken book. Unfortunately, the other book in the package was also damaged.
The story is not to be outdone in banality. All predictable. Then there is the terrible translation, I would have to rewrite almost every sentence. So little sense of language. Even the speaker of the audiobook is only bad. Pathetic! I absolutely cannot explain the success of the book. It may be that it captivates teenagers, but for adults it is simply recommending doing nothing.
The book arrived at us in a bad quality, the pages are curled as if it had gotten wet. The cover also reveals signs of usage, as if it were 2nd choice. Pages were missing, never again!
The dishes are relatively similar and not exciting. Most of the time, noodles are used. I was expecting a little more variety with this book.
The protective cover was dirty. The book would not have been a gift.
The book is certainly entertaining! But I have the feeling that facts, poetry and personal opinion are very much mixed up!
Time and wasting money. Simply the worst and most boring film in a long time.
The film is absolutely not recommended! Too bad for the wasted life!
For the money I should have bought a box of Oettinger. The fun would be much bigger and more persistent. The film is not to be outdone in boredom. Money thrown out. What was the Oscar for?
Can't understand the top reviews. From my mind, it may be that the acting performance of the leading actor is really suspicious of price, but the whole work as a die-hard BATMAN fan is just SCRAP! Sorry!
You don't have to look. Acting good, but action long-winded. A shambles. How can such a recession come out of this for heaven's sake? I cannot understand with the best of intentions. Maybe click worker. Sorry folks, I don't do anything like that anymore. Then I just look at old movies.
Pure boredom the actor saves a lot.
The film is not worth seeing, who ever saw it in the cinema and left prematurely, can only have done so out of boredom.
This is the worst film I've seen in a long time. It has been reported in the media that viewers have left the cinema in the middle of it, absolutely understandable with a succession of so much rubbish and the highly acclaimed actor is just disgusting and a torment to watch.
For me, the film is one of the most disappointing and boring I've ever seen. For me, the film had no funny or exciting scenes. I can't understand why this movie was the favorite for an Oscar.
I was extremely disappointed. Why did such a film have to be made? Heath Ledger has already put the crown on the Joker. This film here is certainly not to be surpassed in nonsense. Dark mood, bad story, wasted life.
Psychogram without real action, not what you expect from the trailer.
Very boring. Unfortunately, I expected more.
For me and my son, the film was too boring.
I was hoping for more from the film.
Much, a lot, and even more nonsensical action, doofe's stupid hysterical rum laughter, zero action.
I absolutely didn't like the film. I found it more annoying.
The worst movie I've seen in a long time. Totally boring.
The worst film of all time. What a waste of money.
I can't understand the Oscar. No comparison to Heath Ledgers' Joker. Lots of fidgeting of the main actor, but nothing surprising or new.
I imagined a much more exciting film. And not just his stupid laugh.
The worst Joker movie of all time ... In my opinion.
Was very disappointed.
Super, I fell into the hype. No wonder the audience left the cinema. The story has nothing to do with DC. Just boring. I don't even watch the garbage on free TV anymore! Save yourself the money and do something better with it.
I didn't like it at all. What a pity!
What is this film supposed to tell us? He's just sick!!!
The film has no content. No action. No dramaturgy. This film is cheered up for nothing.
I didn't like the film, it was boring and barren. Can't recommend it any further.
The film wasn't my thing, I imagined the film differently. Unfortunately, it was only playable in Italian and English, no German. Luckily, I do well in English. Well, the movie is not comparable to other Joker movies. The best joker I've ever seen was the one with Heath Ledger. That was the best joker ever for me.
What rubbish.
Just bad.
Disappointed by the plot and portrayal of Joker.
It takes a lot of perseverance to endure the joker to the end and not to press the stop button prematurely. Many boring passages, one or two "exciting" scenes don't make it any better either. You could easily compress the film to 30 min.
One of the worst DC movies of all time. It turns out once again that not everything that has a good name is good.
If you like Batman and liked the Joker in the dark knight, don't let the DC universe be ripped off. Boring, long-winded, with 8 different moments, in the last 15minutes in which the film could have ended. Absolute waste of time.
The trailer was top, the movie flop. Even as hardcore fans of the profession, at least 90% of the 2 hrs of the film duration were for the ton. The Joker actor did his thing great in acting and played the madman very well. But the expected action film was missing except for a few scenes. What a pity.
An absolutely missed chance to make a special film with rarely good source material! But consistently bad.
The film is supposed to be so exciting. No, I found it boring. The Joker looks more silly than dangerous. Was really disappointed ...
I can't understand why this film got such good reviews! But everyone has a different taste.
Nothing special.
I cannot understand the positive reviews. The film drags on before it gets interesting. Overall, however, disappointing.
Don't understand the hype around the film. It's just incredibly barren and boring.
What there was in the run-up to the film hype, I can't understand, a boring Sunday afternoon movie. His money is far from worth.
Unfortunately, the film did not meet my expectations. The plot was quite imaginative and boring. Don't understand why this film is so praised.
I don't know why the film is so hyped. Acting certainly a good performance, but a depressed clown dragging himself through the day is called everyday life for me. I don't have to go to the cinema to do that.
I had imagined otherwise. Wasn't worth his money. Luckily, I wasn't in the cinema.
This is one of the most unspectacular films I've seen. The whole prehistory could have been negotiated in max. 20 min. Unfortunately, my expectations were deeply disappointed.
Money thrown out. Every euro hurts.
So we didn't like it at all. Too bad for my money.
Far too long-winded and cumbersome.
Unfortunately it is not so my taste, it was boring, dramatic and depressing. Unfortunately no action and fantasy bound what you expect from Marvel.
This film has nothing to do with the Joker from Batman, but it could be an x-any criminal who uses the Joker costume for his mental health problems - disappointing for anyone who knows the Batman movies.
I do not understand the partly good assessment. The film is boring and rather a bit of psycho. Luckily, he was only on loan for 2 euros.
Somehow the worst movie I've seen in a long time.
Was an oversight.
The actor played his role perfectly, everything else is crap. Not a great movie.
No idea why such hype is being made around this film. At best average ... This film has nothing to do with the Joker from Batman, but it could be an x-any criminal who uses the Joker costume for his mental health problems - disappointing for anyone who knows the Batman movies.
Boring!!! The acting performance doesn't help either!
Total disappointment, would rarely have seen such a nasty movie.
Not to be recommended.
The film was uninteresting.
Very long-winded film that doesn't live up to the hype. There were better Joker actors who better embodied the original character. Too bad some expected more.
I didn't like it.
A predictable story far too long. Very disappointing.
One of the worst movies I've ever seen.
Unfortunately, I didn't like this film at all. Zero action and long-winded.
Probably the worst movie I've ever seen. Hype totally unjustified. Loud movie mistake just bad. I would have expected a lot more. They should have filmed the Alan Moore Joker.
Well, what to say, the only thing that's good in this film is the acting performance of Joaquin Phoenix. Hatoffs!! Otherwise you see and never need again. Just boring!!!! Pure taste thing point!!
Also find the movie mega boring. The acting performance was very, very good. But can't recommend it under any circumstances. Should have used my time more sensibly....
There is no bad expression at all. Boring and very long-drawn, the main actor is extremely unsympathetic. Can't follow up the positive reviews. Sorry.. 2 std of my life shot in the ton.
I am really disappointed and at the same time angry. This film is a bottomless outrage. Something of bad .... I can't understand why some people give two stars or more. Zero stars for this movie. Fingers off, money wasted.
This movie is by far the most boring I've ever seen! People are said to have run out of the cinema "disturbed" !!! Of course, with such a buck manicity, I can understand this well!!!
A big disappointment two boring hours. Where the film keeps spinning in circles! One of the worst movies I've seen in the last few years! Would take me the 2 hours for something different time! Unfortunately, it is not worth it!
Film was totally boring. Hype was absolutely unjustified. 1.5 h of it only prehistory and no action only psychozeugum, but that does not even fit Joker.
Hasn't been that great now. Long-winded and predictable! Nööö, that was nothing!
We watched this movie for 4 and everyone thought it was boring, zero psycho and just bad.
For me personally, this film deserves the golden raspberry. The most boring film of recent years. But it is good that everyone has a different taste. Always wanted to stop looking at me until the end. Still, I managed to keep him awake until the end. But the ultra blu-ray has a great image. For me, the only positive thing is that.
This is really the worst movie I've seen in a long time. In the movie exactly 3 "semi exciting" things happen and you can see them in the trailer. Absolutely boring, not to mention the disgustingly bad actor. The film is not only grotesquely bad, but really embarrassing, stupid and qualitatively poor lyproduced as well as cheaply produced. So I have to say, I have been blinded by the good rating of some here. My expectation for the film was probably too high. The first 60-70 min totally boring ... Then there was a bit more suspense and then the film was already out. I thought the movie would be more "Joker like"... Mentally ill... as the Joker is, blood and sick games... but the film is just badly done.
Drama without suspense. I waited until the end for the thriller elements, but I didn't do it completely.
What does the film have to do with a masterpiece? I didn't like him.
I borrowed the film and watched it with expectation, people what's going on, certainly this is good in terms of acting, but the film as a whole is pure boredom, long-winded. Anyone who has ever seen a Batman movie will take a look at the Joker movies with Jack Nicholson and Heather Ledger for the second time.
Don't understand the hype. I found the movie mega boring ... and this horrible giggly was hard to bear.
The sometimes most desolate film of 2019. Extremely disappointing and long-winded. I cannot understand the positive reviews. In addition, an incorrect time classification in the DC Comics series. Bruce Wayne's parents were killed much later.
One of the worst movies of my life. I am very disappointed. The 2 hours would have been better invested in counting salt grains.
Absolute crap, he deserved the golden raspberry. Boring, long-winded, the transformation to the Joker implausible, story abstrus. Don't know what else to list. Well, if you want to enjoy the moments of foreign shame, this is a true masterpiece for you. For everyone else - save you the money!
Naughty of this film. No justification for existence. Steal from two Scorsese classics.
Bad movie, disturbing.
Bad... Worse... Joker. Once again managed to hum a movie and all would-be critics lift this crap. This cracked laughter throughout the film, this clapped-out ending, this only boredom. Nothing happens in this movie. All those who give here 5 stars certainly also recognize schlefaz films as art.
The disappointment of the year. 2 hours yawning boredom. Nothing really surprising. Lots of script holes. Except for the film music, nothing was convincing. You can save yourself.
This was by far the most boring film of all time. From minute to minute, it was harder to bear this film. It is sad that there are mentally disturbed people, but also to make a film about it. Too bad for the money.
I didn't like the film at all. He pulled like chewing gum and unfortunately had nothing to do with the joker we seem to know from the comics. So don't understand all the hype.
Unjustified hype.. Totally boring, saying nothing.
Terrible film, boring and totally messy and chaotic.
Not seen in such a way for a long time.
Unfortunately, you can award no less than one star. The film is bleak, absolutely grisly and repulsive.
Rarely seen such a boring movie. Dark, psycho, boring and confusing. Where do the good reviews come from?
Many see it as a masterpiece, which is ridiculous to my eyes. The film is so boring that I took at min. 3 breaks and watched something different in between. The content can be easily reduced to 30 minutes.
MEGA boring, worst movie of the year !!!
Had high hopes in this film, but was quite disappointed. Unable to recommend it.
Luckily, I didn't spend any money on this film. Boring and very unspectacular to the end. The Oscar was not justified.
Well played but extremely lengthy and between it just lacks something in the story.
Absolute garbage, long-winded and boring. Too bad for the money. Can't understand the hype around this film at all.
So such a garbage. Every minute of this movie is wasted time. I put it in the same drawer as the ancient "A Clockwork Orange". My wife agrees. Put your head in the sand for 2 hours, you'll have more of it.
I was very disappointed with the concert DVD. There are no extras and the camera guidance is very economical! The live atmosphere doesn't come over for a moment. It's not worth it.
It doesn't get any worse. The few video scenes that are available on the two DVDs are also drowned out by the commentator's constant chatter.
The film itself is certainly a matter of taste, but the DVD is technically just not okay! Get stuck, skip a few scenes in three places and then play on! Poor quality! Never again!
I was pretty disappointed. I ordered the HD version and only received one SD version due to non-availability. However, I still had to pay the price for the HD version. Just buy the movie in the store. You know what you're getting.
This whole film series is a disgrace to this great 7-part book series.
Very bad. Got the dvd out of the shell for the first time today and it just hangs up. Thank you.
Clearly the worst film in the series. After 20 minutes I have already been in the land of dreams. Incoherent, boring and sleepy. The other parts were really fun, because varied, there was no anything to laugh about, nor was there any tension. What a pity!
Most parts have something like a dynamic, this part is completely off. You want to clean up the apartment or go to sleep early... It's a pity, but there's a slip with so many parts.
If you want to see a dark movie with warlike scenes, here's the right place. Not suitable for children and adolescents under 16 years of age. This is not a children's film and you have to know all the previous films/books to understand the connections.
The quality of the Blu-Ray playback is really very bad and has disappointed me very much. Very dark everything and coarse-grained, almost pixelated. For a BD, this is money thrown out, the (not vohanden) quality can be watched more cheaply on DVD.
The film itself is quite long-winded and to fall asleep, in terms of image quality quite OK. However, the sound is the last on the first Blu-ray several dropouts and also on the exchanged Blu-ray the sound is sometimes very quiet and also has a complete dropout.
The quality of the film is deficient in part hardly anything to recognize, after an hour we just couldn't look and switched off!
This is arguably by far the worst Harry Potter film in the series. The scenes are incoherently and logically incomprehensible; without having read the book, you don't understand anything at all! No arc of tension, no atmosphere and only confused rum gelaber. Too bad, it was thrown out money to buy the DVD, but we are really glad not to have watched the movie in the cinema at that time!
I have not read that book, but all the other 6 movies have been seen and as a DVD at home. So I didn't want to miss this part. However, I have rarely felt as badly entertained as I did in this film. After this film, I have to say it's good that Harry Potter has died.
Delivery was ok. But on the DVD were fingerprints that rendered the film unusable. It is clear that quality needs to be checked. However, a seller should be able to clean up damage caused by the inspection or not offer the DVD for sale. The provider is stored by me as someone with whom I no longer buy anything.
The condition of the DVD was given very well, but it is permanently stuck during play.
The film is a complete disaster! All the excitement and the great story about Voldemord is completely lost, the great director probably didn't think it was important to film the real problem of Harry Potter (Voldemord) but rather about the in love teens. Often you also have the feeling that the film is being rewinded, one cut after another you are thrown from one scene into another! The worst movie in the Potter series!! My tip to you: read the book and watch the movie! I am sure that everyone, like myself and the previous speakers, will judge!
Unfortunately, I have to join many of the previous speakers. The 6th HP movie is just disappointing. No atmosphere, no tension, no co-fever. I wonder if the production team has read the books in full and intensively. Anyone who knows the books can only be strongly discouraged from this film! Too annoying to award at least one point.
Long-winded and boring, with no significant effects and really completely tensionless. Even the few scenes with "Action" were so lovelessly staged and played that you could fall asleep. A maximum of 90 minutes would have been more than enough. Very bad. After all, the image quality is fine, but still the Blu-ray lacks the German sound in HD quality, as is often the case here.
This is exactly where the problem is: the film is far too serious and, incidentally, still stinky. Nolan is a good director, but here he had a low point. No trace of comic feeling. The film is more of a psychodrama for people with VIEEEL patience.
So this movie is really sometimes boring especially the first half, where a lot is explained (too much) and drags the film into length !!!!! And that also Batman can only be seen at the climax of the film. What's missing more of it, I found the first two movies much better, which have also become cult of course. But this film disappoints. I was expecting more. Too bad actually.
In the other reviews I read that this film should also be uncut - I will look at it in the hope that it is better. This version is absolute garbage!
There are really better movies in the genre and especially by Luc Besson! Maybe there are people who like it, in my opinion a waste of time!
This film is neither exciting nor can you grumble in any way. The main actors really do everything they can to get killed, e.g. to draw attention to the enemy at the important moment with loud screams when you approach him from behind. A series of pointless and completely brain-cracking scenes that only get on your nerves.
Personally, I think the film is an absolute disaster. The story itself is, I think, quite good, but here you can see the best example of what incompetent actors can do.
So really, I've rarely seen such a stupid movie. Stink boring, 0 scary effect. So really ... I'm glad I didn't spend any money on trash !!!
I actually find all HP film ingessibles failed (except maybe part 3) but this part is particularly ridiculous, so you can't get out of the foreign shame. Absolute disaster.
Insane book and incredibly poorly executed in the film. The beginning, just horrible. You miss a lot of things and some things were just completely rewritten. This constant camera change is annoying. Unfortunately only one point but only because I like the Harry Potter books and the other movies were terrific.
This whole film series is a disgrace to this great 7-part book series.
What were we looking forward to Season 8? It became a disappointment. The consequences seem like a time-lapse. The development of the characters is therefore incomprehensible. In episode 3, the image is underground in dark scenes.
If you look at the last season of GOT, I wonder what I actually had to wait 2 years. Endless bored dialogues in Winterfell and an end that offers few surprises. Too bad... There could have been something better delivered.
So season 7 was already too much at the same time and did a lot of damage to the story, the end of season 8, so even less desire and you shouldn't have to broadcast. Don't understand that at all and feel it's completely wrong.
Unfortunately, the 8th season completely disappoints and the last episode was a naughty one, how could it happen? Best to re-spin the season, but won't happen..... I will read the books now.
OK The money I could have saved myself. Unfortunately, this season lacked almost everything that made the previous ones so famous. Now it's over and I don't miss it for a second. The characters began to be more detached and less human in Season 7. In Season 8, I can only turn my eyes to my back when I see most of the characters presenting themselves in a more extreme way. Sympathy points there here zero comma zero zero nix
Too bad for wasted time and money. Actually, you would have to get pain money for it. The first three parts live only on the hope that it will finally get better. Perhaps it is better that the series ends now.
I expected a lot more from last season. Above all, however, it is not already out after 6 episodes. I very much regret having spent the €20 for this season. If there were 0 stars, I would forgive them.
Absolute waste of money and time. It's a pity you can't send digital content back to Amazon!
As many other people have anticipated, the finale of the series is a bad joke. I also somehow cannot comprehend the demand for almost 40 euros for 6 episodes. rip-off at the highest level. Unfortunately, I didn't know that before, because I simply didn't expect it. My husband was totally disappointed with the Blu Ray and I am relieved that the series is finally over. An end to terror... and disbelief!
How can the most brilliant fantasy series ever invented end in such a debacle? Incomprehensible.
Does it seem as if the production crew on the road has lost either the desire or the mind, or both? Too bad for a great story that ends up sinking into bombastic ingenuity.
After years of being an absolute fan of the series, I'm stunned by this incredibly bad last season. Every penny I spent on it was wasted.
The 8 season did not live up to expectations. Unimaginative, poor camera guidance or PC editing. You might think there's nothing better you should be doing. It's not worth its money.
Lovelessly clapped, a few must necessarily get away and d quickly bring an end. Doesn't do justice to the previous seasons.
That's how you see what happens when a series becomes too successful. Time pressure and CGI effects become more important than telling a story, and so you actually managed to make GoT the same one-size-fits-all that would otherwise flicker across the screens. Sad.
Never watch this season again! Has messed up the entire series!
So honestly folks, you wait 2 years for the final season and then you get underground recordings. Everything completely made on cheap. I am convinced that the 3rd episode was filmed on the toilet. I have had more than once no picture at all only noises. Especially annoying because it was the war of people against the dead. So many extras were not needed and certainly no mask, because you haven't seen anything anyway. Creepy!!!
Horrific how the producers manage to completely destroy all storylines, characters and suspense built up over the entire seven previous seasons within a season. Absolutely not recommended.
The Amazon Stream has an incredibly poor image quality in the dark passages on a 65 OLED from LG. Sound is ok.
Unfortunately, I have to agree with the opinion of the majority here. Season 7 was already... Not good... Season 8 gets worse from episode to episode ... Unfortunately. Unfortunately, Martin also has no chance to complete his work without really kicking a lot of people on their feet and triggering a storm. There is still hope at "Elden Ring".
That was probably the disappointment of the year. A complex story is built up for a decade, and in the end you have such a stupid conclusion.
With only six episodes, much of the story is co-ordinated.
The whole season is ridden down at a fast pace... It's a pity how quickly you can finish a series damn badly on the basis of a permanent carnage. Really a pity, it wasn't even worth buying a special edition, even though I'm a big fan / WAR....
As good as the first seasons were, so disappointing was the last one. With this one you have ruined the whole series. Partly so dark that you have seen almost nothing. A fast and unlovingly twisted season.
If I ordered by mistake, I didn't like it.
For the last season just more Zack Zack, no more background, would have preferred not to have watched the last episodes, I wouldn't have expected such an end, and I'm disappointed.
The descent, which began with the 7th season (no longer a book template), has reached its sad low point this season! Oh, they would have just waited for the books... The fans would have thanked you!
I don't understand what went wrong here, it's bad underground compared to the other seasons. I'm not a hardcore fan but that's just a joke even as a light side-of-the-year meal.
In hindsight, you're always smarter, but buying this season was a huge mistake! A cruel end to GoT, a crammed, uninspired garbage!
Weak season in my eyes, one correctly realized that it should be the last. Massive plot squeezed into the individual episodes. For me, it's not a worthy conclusion to an otherwise outstanding series.
How one can turn such a good template into such a Murks is no longer sad, but a naughty thing! What you're blown up in coal, just the more awkward you get, is absolutely frustrating.
The wait wasn't worth it... Honestly... And that's what some people think ... The end... Isnot my case since dies the wrong ...
I accidentally bought the wrong episode and was then less than a minute on "the Last Watch" than I realized that it's not the last episode of GOT. Since I am less interested in any excerpts from the actors on the red carpet. I just want my money back.
I am disappointed by the quality of the CD's, the 4K discs have a mistake. Two of them have dropouts, stop. I only saw the last two today and now the return time has expired.
Season 8 destroys the entire series!!!! It was nothing and another series with a disappointing end!!!!!!
Had I been looking forward to the final. Finally, just in time for the 3rd of 12th, she finally arrived. For me, what has been worked out within six episodes is pers. absolutely disappointing. You could have easily made 2 or 3 seasons out of it. Just a pity.
OK, it has to end, but this is the weakest season ending I've ever seen. Wasted time!
Worst season.
You notice that the books are missing in the background, the series has so much potential.
I could have saved myself. The final season wasn't that great.
I am very disappointed with this season compared to its predecessors.
The whole thing is an unnecessarily extended encore, which could also have been presented on a DVD.
Just sad how such a great series can end so stupidly. Incomprehensible to me and ruins the rest of the series. It's best never to watch...
What else can be said about this dirt?
Disaster! I share the views of the critics.
Madness! Got worse from series to series. This one is just stupid.
The story is moving too fast and there are a lot of logic errors in the season. Regret the purchase very much
Amazon and sellers all great. But the season is the last. How can you make such a terrible thing out of such a great series. Really nasty.
Disrespectful to the performers and everyone else who has done a great job for 10 years. (Except for the light and camera crew of episode 3.)
Unfortunately, they messed it up. As expected.
Let's hope for a remake as soon as the books catch up...
Why on everything in the world has this nonsense been filmed? Too bad for s material and time.
This season was the weakest of all.
The last season just ruined the whole series.
Good 7 years of series spectacle just so dirty with this dirty season!!!
Only bought because all the seasons were terrific before. The dilettante conclusion must not be missing.
So what's going on at Amazon? You buy the relay pass and are asked to buy it extra during the 3rd episode? 1 star for such a naughtiness!
I'm just disappointed. This season is not worth the money.
After seven outstanding seasons, the eighth season is a bitter disappointment.
Dirty. Unfortunately completely bad!!!
Quality is real underground!
Unfortunately, the ingenious series has drastically reduced towards the end. The fan will probably watch it season, but unfortunately it's a waste of time.
Highly disappointing finale. Much more could not have been told in even fewer episodes.
Poor image quality.
There is virtually nothing positive to say about this season. There is no logic for action. Only the CGI effects are visible.
I couldn't even imagine that such an excellent series could end so badly. Lost was finally surpassed.
A terrible ending for an unbelievably good series. The style of the series changes dramatically in Season 8.
Disappointed by the series. There is no need to say more.
Incredibly bad. Nice animations but the story is in free fall..
I have to say honestly that I am very disappointed with the 8th season.
The last crap, how can you drive a series with a season so to the wall.
DVD doesn't run properly extreme pixel errors, sound stays out, everything jerks!!!
Complete fall.
Just bad and lots of boring buffer scenes.
Boring and badly done!
I could have saved myself.
The DVDs have a very poor image quality, which is extremely low compared to the suppliers of the other seasons.
Only the 1st DVD could be played. None else. But it's not the Blu-Ray Player. Tried three different new devices. Will no longer buy used DVDs in the future.
Can't watch the last episode. No help from Amazon. Wants my money back!!!
If I had read the other 1-star assessments, I would have saved myself two barren, stupid hours. I wasn't expecting a masterpiece. I suspected the film was similar to "Pearl Harbor" from 2001, but it's a lot worse. My tip: Just look at something else.
Anyone who expects a war movie like "The Soldier James Ryan" will be very disappointed. The propaganda machine from Hollywood has been at its peak since trump was elected. Too bad that so many famous stars play in this brainless war movie.
Actually, I like remake, new technology, etc. This film doesn't even come close to the classic. Neither history nor processes were presented in a reasonable way here. The whole film doesn't technically come close to Pearl Harbour. Voltage??? Null. Acting zero ... I would prefer to claim my money back.
Madness how bad the movie is! The animations are underground and the rest just embarrassing. Hopefully Roland's last movie.
What a trivial film. Tension never comes up. The actors remain absolutely flat and their fate is absolutely irrelevant. What a nasty script.
Unrealistic computer animations with actors displayed. Blunt, rowed action. Those who endure the film to the end deserve the bravery medal of the US film industry.
I had to switch off after 20 minutes. As a sensible person, you can no longer stand this film. I like history films, but this is nanish none.
So when you look at this movie, you shouldn't have too much expectation. I recommend you to look at the original. Much better than this movie!
Rarely seen such a kitsch and the effects also look extremely artificial.
This is from Emmerich? Hard to believe the Patriot, Independence Day, from the same director. Is he in a coma or what?
Exuberant and completely unrealistic, American war propaganda. I wouldn't have trusted this director to do that.
Unfortunately, the film lacks charm and charisma. Even those interested in history are only brought close to events to a limited extent. I expected more from a Roland-Emmerich film. Pros: Camera and pictures.
So you put 4K on the sidelines, very poor image quality, hardly better than DVD, just embarrassing. This is probably only a matter of withdrawing money from film fans who are enthusiastic about technology with as little effort as possible, really disappointing!!!
Boring and no comparison to Pearl Harbor.
Rarely seen such a bad movie.
Boring and technically a real B-trash movie.
Cheap Copy... Really bad... Cruel acting performance... Villt.... Good idea... But poorly implemented...!!!!!
Bad! Levelless work. Bad script with poor cinematic implementation. 3D animation and effects are full of errors.
Well, there are much better movies to show too much !!! Missing something gripping,...
I actually like war movies a lot. But this is more of an animated film. Any, really every setting to be seen on the war machine is artificial. Even in close range. Everything seems synthetic, clinical. Sorry, but I can't take that seriously.
I've never seen a film that treats both the plot and its protagonists more superficially than this one!
Unfortunately, this is only China-Ramsch. The few good actors can only reproduce what is in the bad script. Rarely need to see such a bad movie.
Absolute garbage, bad animation, acting an absolute misstep.. Ed Skrein is not a leading actor, but he lacks the acting. I don't understand how some people like this movie and compare it to Pearl Harbor .. There are continents in between ..
Impressive how much worse a modern film can be compared to an old one, even though it actually has all the possibilities to use the latest technology etc. But if you want to see a film about the Battle of Midway, you should definitely reach for the old.
Re-filmed again and again and yet always the same.
What a bad movie is about 14 euros. I have no idea what the makers were going to do here, it didn't work out anyway.
Image and sound out of sync!
Wow. I approached the film with relatively low expectations, but here I really managed to use about every bad cliché and at the same time incorporate a lot of logical errors. The film is more Harry Potter than Star Wars and ends the series with a real disaster. Too bad about it.
One of the most stupid films this year. Okay, visually outstanding but the story, the myth, the timeless in Star Wars - none of this is available here anymore. We see Rey as a kind of defiant, slightly doofer Jedi following her instincts, come what may ... geaorge lucas rotates in the grave, oh wait, he is still alive and is ashamed that he sold all this to Disney .... terrible film
Incredibly bad. Why the hell you didn't just make the Original Thrawn trilogy. I want my money back. ...
I don't know what to say... Half of the film was my husband and I thinking about which next absolutely trashy scene will flicker. Madness, we guessed almost all of them, because the film just wanted to bring all the old elements in again. I really love parts 1-6, which is why this movie almost hurts me. Animations great, actors top only unfortunately a bit tinkered in by everyone and thus felt nothing achieved.... I'm really angry that such a film should complete Star Wars. The saga didn't deserve that...
I can only agree with the many, objectively summarized 1-2 star ratings. Illogical, exaggerated, without heart. Just weak this conclusion to a saga so great before Disney.
The worst part ever. No sense no concept. Since Disney leads the scepter here, the fairy tale goes before the dogs.
I have seen all the parts and am MEGA disappointed. Too bad for the money .... I don't have the words to get to the end.
Disney has no idea about Star Wars.... What a trash.
No longer comprehensible story. Missing great and it's good that he's the last movie in the otherwise very good series. Really a pity that they have so dirty the end
Even someone who isn't a Star Wars fan and knows only half the other parts has to realize how badly the characters are told and how miserably the story is written together. In the end, only the special effects remain and even the ones seem somehow clumsy. If it were a B-movie with no million budget, I would give vllt two stars. Thank you Disney.
You could see from the beginning that Disney has no idea about Star Wars.
The implementation is completely opaque. It seems completely unmotivated people in places where they can't be, get skills as it just fits and die as it just fits. The worst Star Wars of the entire series.
Sword fights on spaceships outside without any spacesuit, resurrection of a villain without real logic and actual necessity, stupid narrative strands without meaning and a simple but not even somehow ordered plot have disappointed me very much. When such a good idea is made worse and worse, and now so miraculous transformations and conversions, including snarling and unsatisfactory, a very disappointing experience ends. Too bad for the missed opportunity and the nice money!
The worst Star Wars of all time.
Really not worthy to have the name Star Wars in the title. Just a bad story.
Worst Star Wars movie ever. The image quality is top, the film scenes in space are also good. The leading actress comes over like a howler and messes up the whole film. I am extremely disappointed.
Just boring....
By far the worst film in the saga. Mercilessly exaggerated costumes like the masked ball, completely confused storylines, cramped humour paired with senseless retro elements. Sorry, any charm of the originals, which was found at least in part one of this trilogy, is lost here. An absolutely unworthy ending for movies with Skywalker and Co, just to toast through the stupid end of GoT.
Medium more not. Skywalker & Co that was probably nothing. Story & acting mies and worlds away from the old parts. What a pity...
Along with episodes 7 and 8, one of the most expensive trash movies ever determined. Unfortunately, there were no 3-headed space sharks or a planet-destroying tornado from Ewoks. In addition, Starship Troopers proves that even with significantly less Kente you can produce significantly better movies. But the animations and effects were quite nice.
If I could give minus values, the film would get the full number of stars! By far the worst Starwars movie!
As a die-hard Star Wars fan, you already have problems with Episode 7+8. This episode is just cruel. The plot the last, the animations seem incompletely edited and are not at the usual level. For me, it's a zero number.
Just not what it used to be
Don't know where to start... simply ridiculous
quite nasty.... Acts as if constructed by chance. Luckily, it's over now. How to drive a series to the wall like this....
Everything has already been said about the film. In order to have a say, I also zapped through and was not disappointed. Pure grotto. The worst film in an unworthy sequel trilogy of the Star Wars saga. Sad for such potential.
The film is an insult to all Star Wars fans. So many logic holes... Incredibly, the script was so woven through. Disney is only interested in money. Just get me the steelbook so I have all the steelbooks of the last trilogy. I shouldn't have done it. A disgrace.
Too bad what became of Star Wars, an era is coming to an end and commercial waste is spreading.
It was the worst movie I've seen in years. A star is still far too good a rating for such a performance. Normally you should get the money refunded. I'm FULL OF DISSIng but I'm to blame myself for not listening to the people who had already seen the film.
The worst star was. Since it was sold to Walt Disney, Star Wars is just scrap.
Miese's screenplay, nasty plot. Wasted money and wasted time.
Clearly not a grand final. In my opinion, the weakest film in the series.
The Star Wars flair is gone.
What shall I say... I made the film when one of the imperialists says to Kylo "I find the mask beautiful" Too bad...
It's a disgrace that it's going to end like this. The scenes are very poorly cut and the plot very confused.
Unfortunately, the last three parts were the worst movies of all time.
Confused content and sadly poorly implemented. Not a climb, but a deep crash! Actually minus stars.
I haven't seen such a loveless schmarrn. Finally, embarrassingly, finally makes good science fiction again and not such nonsense. Thank you for nothing.
What has become of SW !? You could lose almost all respect for filmmakers.
I have seen so many fragments in the picture. Didn't have any fun watching it at all.
Unfortunately, all three episodes are a single disappointment and have irreparably damaged the franchise.
Too bad what was made of a good series. I am deeply disappointed.
Sad just sad. A decades-long cult series ends in a film that you can't expect to end. Levelless B-movie. Every other word is too much. Unfortunately.
Grandiose bad end to the best saga of all time. R.I.P. Star Wars.
Just come out of the cinema and have to say: it can't be worse! Very questionable scenes and dialogues. Disney is breaking a saga once again. I'll probably never go back into a Star Wars movie. Very bad.
It's just a bad movie! Considering what George Lucas created and then Disney knocks something out ... Don't go into the movie!!!
Just sad. Three films that contradict each other. The story in this film is not thought through, too simple or full of logic errors. Disney has totally failed here. The only thing that remains is the feeling that the Star Wars universe is being exploited.
The film is grotesquely bad! All 1-star reviews are FULLY eligible! There is nothing more to say. My God, what did Disney make of Star Wars... Please DO NOT shoot any more Star Wars movies, Disney. R.i.p.
An embarrassing waste of time, which shouldn't even have deserved a star, there are probably five more deducted. No Star Wars fan should watch the "New Trilogy," but the ending is more gruesome than anything before. This hasn't been AStar Wars since Episode VII, that's Disney and they've got it really nasty!!
I saw the film in the cinema. I should have saved the money. It's a pity that episodes 7,8 and 9 were never filmed. The Disney trilogy has nothing to do with george Lucas's books. Only the names have been adopted. If you want to know what's really going on, you can check out the script plots George Lucas on the Internet.
Having already killed Star Wars in the last film, comes a slightly less nonsensical, but still dramatic-doofer movie.
A boring movie that finally puts an end to Disney's boring saga. The original saga by George Lucas has so much potential and Disney makes a soft-washed mish-mash out of it. Lightsaber battles that are worth no speech and a space battle without tension. Thus, this part is only second-class.
I could write my fingers bloody here. But I don't want to bother. Laaangweilig, bad story, bad actors. I would give the film a minus 10.
This film is the culmination of a terribly bad Star Wars trilogy. The film will never be remembered. Weak-minded action without end, a loveless work. I don't want to say more about the scrap!!!!!
Such a scrap. Everyone can resuscitate anyone. The old heroes must still die. Then you also ride on gäulen on a star destroyer. Rotz high 10
Oh God, this is a smear, which is even worse than the other two films. Star destroyer with a death star laser etc, etc., etc., etc., etc..
The film is just embarrassing. Disney has really managed to ridicule Star Wars.
Not as Star Wars, as you know it and love it.
After 30 minutes left the cinema. Here you can save life. Top 5 worst movies of all time, still comes after sharknado.
A series of many great Starwars scenes to a completely meaningless film... One really wonders if the people who broke the script didn't ask themselves at some point whether the project should not be let die in peace. Too bad for the electricity used to stream.
Just one star for this so-called Star Wars movie. As an old fan of Star Wars, this latest movie is a C-movie without a level!
Just bad! I don't know what's worst, the story, the actors or the cramped attempt to make a movie that has "Viral Monente" and sinks completely into futility... Just a pity!
Unfortunately, I have to give a star. The worst Star Wars movie ever!!! Episodes 7 and 8 were already bad, but Episode 9 still puts the crown or golden raspberry on the whole. Really cruel!!!
Disney has broken Star Wars. There is nothing more to say. And this film as a conclusion... My gosh. You can only watch if you turn off your mind and don't appreciate the old movies... Thank you Mrs Kennedy
Not sure which part of the new trilogy was the worst. All are bad and a cheap, bad copy of the original trilogy. I don't care about the characters and the story is a joke, as I said. That's not going to happen with Star Wars.
What was swarmed up here in the last part of the new trilogy hurts me as a Star wars fan every second. Incredibly one-dimensional characters, loveless events and a villain whose existence and force would not be rightwith any reasoning in the world.
An absolute mess - I thought the Last Jedi killed the franchise, but no - the last sargnagel is this cinematic birth of Jar Jar Abrams.
You can only shake your head over so many logic holes....
This should be reflected in the sales figures. Cheap Cheap Cheap We Home Cinema fans don't care. The main thing is to sell them. It's a pity, though, i'm also whistling at it.
This is the worst film in the entire trilogy. It's just unbelievable what Disney has made of this movie series. This film is not worth a penny. The dirt on my shoe is ten times more interesting.
Throughout, the last parts were stupid. Here allusion and there. Everything has been seen before and better. Namely the first 2 trilogies. Not recommended.
Absolutely embarrassing conclusion to an unnecessary trilogy. After all, it has now come to an end.
Lifetime I never get back....
Not only did he ruin my childhood, but also the work of George Lucas with stupid new powers that NO wanted to see.
Dramatologically bad. Sword fights totally unspectacular. And many more criticisms.
The film is an excellent case study of how a film can be produced as far as possible by the fans and all target groups.
When I saw the film, I was just disappointed. The last film was very mediocre but the one here, just bad.
Very weak.
Really nasty!
Just embarrassing for the whole Star Wars story. And the costs were insanely high... nothing. :-(
An insult to anyone who grew up with the old Star Wars movies. Pure effect-hating and thin logic and action viewed like a piece of paper from the side. The Fall of Skywalker !
Was something decontaminated where the release Kamm unfortunately no Schubert like in the first 6 seasons
The OV part refers only to English subtitles - very disappointing!
I had to struggle hard not to fall asleep, even my little son may have fallen asleep a better goodnight story.
Product information is simply wrong. Very annoying.
Claim and logic get powerfully on the muzzle here. The most submortal action and patriotism to do in the ray.
Completely beside it. The president in the hospital no helicopter and..
Was a poorly produced action movie. Weakness plot, weakness computer animations. Gerard Butler couldn't save anything either.
Incredible grits on the border of ridicule. Unfortunately illogical, poorly produced and completely uninspired.
Fingers off. The worst film in the series. Not a good story. Far too short and ..... oh he's just shit and bad. Really sad. Mann could have made the film much better. So fingers off!!!
I couldn't have imagined that there could be such a grotesque Rambo movie. From the synchronisation to the absolutely brainless action, which could not be improved by the degenerate brutality. Unanimous opinion according to the film - Grottenschlecht!
I can only say that the 5th part of Rambo is just rubbish. No story, no suspense. The scenes of violence at the end are just ridiculous. I was so looking forward to the film. What do I get to see? Just absolutely ridiculous rubbish. I can only hope that this is the last part. Because it's hard to get any worse. Because this series of Rambo really doesn't deserve such a farewell. The film is an absolute joke. Not recommended any further.
Very flat story. Occupation rather mediocre. Nice Gore factor (brutal). Mr. Stallone can hardly look at it thanks to facial surgery... for fans of the Rambo series perhaps a must - for everyone else rather B-movie entertainment.
Sorry but here was missed the time to stop by a few years, Sly sneaks through the movie like a fresh hip-operated and depending on the setting you sometimes think: "Who's the guy with the Halloween mask on the horse" the story is unfortunately 0815.
Boring... I'm used to another Rambo. Only at the end of the film he really gets into action, but... somehow quite imaginative. I don't recommend the film. Too bad for the money.
Unfortunately, Stallone does not have his original voice. It's also not a typical Rambo movie. There is an eternal and finally a bloodbath. Remember more of a bad drug cartel movie.
A bad mix of "Only 96 Hours" and "Kevin Alone at Home". It's a pity that a saga from adolescence to middle adulthood comes to an end. Loved made.
The film wasn't special, the tension slowly built up to the end. The end was martial as expected with all the traps Rambo has in stock.
I know the other movies, not so great this time. Above all, the war veteran is so naive, unbelievable. But everything is far more brutal than any before
Not good at all, the film has nothing to do with Rambo. Far too many really bloody scenes that are very reminiscent of a HORROR movie. Terrible!
I borrowed the film because it is rated with 4 stars , ... but the action and the presentation is, in my opinion, total nonsense!
It was rather disappointing, clearly Stallone has already come into the day. But some sequences of action are so wrong. Should have saved me the money.
Nobody needs that. Destroy the whole saga. Cheap story, brutally nasty sly and perverse cheap splatter scenes towards the end. The makers apparently did not take the film for themselves, otherwise they would surely have noticed the plot jumps and logic holes. Wasted time and coal.
Just a star for the worst RAMBO movie ever. The film corresponds to a B movie and so it is.
A sequel that does not achieve the quality of the previous parts. I was rather disappointed.
Terribly synchronized.. Unfortunately, the new voice doesn't work for me and that's only about 10 min action. Film wasn't worth it at all for 5€ borrowing. I am very disappointed.
Even the €0.99 on offer was too much. Has nothing more to do with the classic Rambo. The Aldi microwave popcorn was the highlight of the film!
I haven't seen such crap in a long time. Even my husband, who is a huge Rambo fan and keeps pulling in the old Rambos, was completely disappointed. Luckily, we didn't buy the crap.
Contradictory, narrow and snoring story. Unusual dubbing voice in the German version. Really an abysmal bad movie.
The star is only available as a consolation patch. You should focus on the previous 4 parts and omit them. Gruesome. Whoever is Rambofan will agree with me.
Too bad for life. Keep John Rambo in good memory and save yourself this movie.
An underground bad movie that mixes a boring story with a non-existent acting performance by Stallone. Superfluous and annoying.
Rarely seen such crap! It can't be worse!
One of the most boring Rambo movies. Was disappointed. Would have expected more. FSK 18 ??
Have fallen asleep. In the plot we would need benzodiazepan to survive it.
The worst Rambo movie I've seen.
What the producers of this work thought!! Just bad. Brutal and meaningless and value-free.
Action very flat, dialogues very reduced. Excessively brutal scenes.
Absolutely not recommended.
The film starts boring and stays boring until you come up with the idea of rewinding to escape the boredom. Then it becomes hopelessly sad. And at the very end comes the inevitable revenge number, which shows a colorful rambotypical mixture of being violently killed in different ways. It doesn't even take long. Rambo 4 was still a passable action movie. This is, apart from a few minutes, pure boredom.
I've watched every Rambo movie and it's just abysmally bad compared to the others. The script apparently came from an intern. The story and the plot were accordingly disappointing. And that should be the end to be remembered? Wasted life, unfortunately.
By far the worst part. Actually, it's a pity to name him in the context of the first iconic parts. Part 4 was still ok. But this one is underground.
Sorry, fans. Just wasted time.
Hollywood's last sham and tries to market well by *name*. Not with me!
Wow what a scrap. Could also go through Taken 4. For the poor, of course. Absolutely avoid.
Synchronous voice disaster, film plot disaster. And then at No. 1? Ridiculous. Not recommended!!
The idea is certainly good, but the execution is a disaster. Tough, without dynamism and wit, the film struggles. The actors don't fit into their roles (I've seen Diane Keaton, for example, often superbly performing, never experienced so badly), the stories around the individual characters are thin, the dialogues hard to bear. One longs for the "Golden Girls" and that one has made the film soon.
Actually I would have to give -5 stars for this long-breathed movie. Because of the cast of the film, I probably expected too much. The film wasn't funny either. Simply irrelevant.
Unfortunately, a complete mis-purchase. The characters are superficial, the jokes flat and just not funny. If the stories were at least deep, but even that remains. I almost fell asleep.
The loan fee would have been better saved. Alberne platte dialogs. Not even these well-known and high-profile actors are taken from their roles. The film is just miserable.
I can't understand why such great actors are for such a shallow, clichéd banter...
Typical for today: great actresses, but no comprehensible storyline, bad script, even worse the direction. Senseless dialogues and just witless. After half an hour I switched. You can save yourself.
The best thing about the film was only the trailer, which unfortunately promised too much. Despite the good cast, I found the film extremely boring and rarely funny. What a pity.
I rarely feel like I'm wasting my time completely, but when I watched this movie, I just thought about forward-thinking or not looking at it at all.
Too bad, actually good actors sometimes impossible synchronized, offer a miserable performance. Lost time.
A barren story that doesn't get going at all. You don't have to have seen.
Despite the otherwise great actresses, I found the film just stupid, nothing feel-good or entertaining. Also found Fonda's outfits, especially the Fixx me boots she wears all the time just embarrassing. Why did I watch this film to the end? So what wasted life.
I bought the film (!!!) because I'm a fan of Diane Keaton. I would have watched the trailer before, then I would have saved the money. The film is annoying, boring and embarrassing. I turned off after 15 min.
Uninspired.... that's probably the best thing to do... This film is simply uninspired, unoriginal, boring... briefly. just not good.. I didn't hold it to the end... and Judy Winter as the voice of Jane Fonda I found really cruel.
A terribly flat film that falls far short of the possibilities of the high-ranking actors... Too bad at the time....
After seeing the film, I wondered how flat a theme can be rolled.
Not recommended! The story seems so enforced that you are sometimes embarrassed.
Embarrassing and annoying, older ladies who seem to have sex in their head.
I turned off this nonsense after 20 minutes. Rarely seen such a miserable film.
Too bad as a fan of the whole Marvel movies (e.g. Ironman series I think I have seen 4 or 5 times) I have to say that he can not keep up with the others. Really bad sayings, special effects yawn, well, I don't really want to remember it anymore, because just bad movie. Borrowing is enough and as a fan of the Marvel film series completely disappointed by this film.
The lead actress doesn't fit into the role. The plot is 0815 and poorly told.
Superficial action. Lots of special effects, bad actors, probably something for teens!
Drawn far too long and lacks the excitement and action for a Marvel movie.
Captain Marvel is not an exciting film. Not a film with particularly interesting content. And it's not a film that particularly flatters the actors. In my opinion, one should rather watch any other movie.
Probably the worst Marvel movie so far. Action and acting performance miserable. Really only recommended for falling asleep.
Made the film after 30 min. Was just too boring.
Can only join the others. Totally uninteresting and superfluous the film.
For me, the worst movie from the Marvel universe. Boring actors, boring dialogues. No comparison to Iron Man, Thor, etc. I switched off in the middle of it.
Looked with great effort to the end and sold immediately afterwards. Was nothing at all. Similar to Black Panther absolute scrap.
I didn't watch the film until the end. It's very boring and the plot can throw in the ton.
I didn't like this movie at all. He's moved on like that. I always thought he was getting better, but unfortunately he wasn't.
Boring, unsympathetic actress and grotesque dialogue. This movie is just not fun!
Poor quality of the disc. Unfortunately, I only tested a few weeks after the purchase and now it turns out that every 10 min the disc hangs. Blu-ray Player is 4 months old and new generation, that's not the case! Can only advise before purchase.
Worst movie in the Avenger series!!
If you want to be chatted dead by S. Jackson, you've got it right. Apart from much talk and outdated lame gags, the film has nothing to offer. I don't buy your role from the actress either. But Marvel is also allowed to produce a lame movie. The last movies were all good before.
I generally think that Marvel is slowly running out of ideas. The best thing is this film, nothing that didn't exist yet, or little new and a barren story.
Probably the worst Marvel movie of all time. Platter humor, forced emotional dulines, miserable acting performance of the leading actress. What was going on with the make-up artist and what is the point of this stupid cat?!
I don't know why it's so well rated. The film was scrap. Save your life and do something else.
After Thor 2, the next yawningly boring and predictable film, in which I even hoped in the cinema that the misery would soon be over. It's a pity that such a cool heroine got off to such a bad start.
Just bad! The whole family was disappointed and the movie night was dirty.
What the film wants to say was understood, but very disappointing and boringly implemented. As for the part of the shootings and attacks, of which you didn't see much, it was kind of second-class. The preview had promised me more than was really shown. With the good actors you could have gotten more out of it. What a pity.
I don't want to spoil the story itself, so I want to be as short as necessary. The film is very long-winded, which is of course a matter of taste. At Interstellar I really liked this style, not here at all. The Wild West was already very hard and cruel, but I lack the authenticity here. In part, it is not at all clear why protagonists feel empathy for opponents and why sometimes not. The film just didn't grab me, it seemed rather boring on the whole.
The film partly provides quite beautiful landscape shots, but otherwise no recommendation from me. The plot of the film is mostly rather boring and stretches out. Individual scenes in the film are simply unrealistic. Too bad about the rental fees
The graphics are beautiful. Beautiful nature etc. The story is corrosive. Just super tough, long monologues in a few words. Besides, it's all about dying. All the time someone dies. Little action, a lot of dying.
Rarely that I have ordered such a bad movie! I aborted him after just under 20 minutes. Money spent in vain.
Not even when ironing, I didn't want to enjoy this monotone spectacle even in the beginning.
The film is completely boring. Not recommended at all.
Rarely seen such a boring garbage. Even the 0.99 cents were too much!
Depressing.. All are ready. Murder and manslaughter.. Lengths.. No tension.. No highlights.. Just depressing.. Worst movie I've ever seen with Christian Bale.
I watched the film on Monday and found the film absolutely boring and uninteresting. I would almost have fallen asleep in the cinema because the 120 minutes drag on quite nicely.
Well, I couldn't get anything out of the movie. Everything made very cheap, see drones. Also predictable and no real action. Acting performance was also absent. No recommendation from me. Was glad that I paid only 0.99 cents, which was also a waste.
Superficial staging, weak actors, weak story.
I was dazzled by the good reviews. The film is superfluous and inconsequential. The story pulled out of the hat, without any sense. Just Avengers for the arms, very poor.
Absolutely not my case.
Clapping off all genres with such a flat story that I had to switch off after 50min. so as not to waste even more life time.
Absolutely not worth seeing, superficial plot, sometimes long scenes, bad story.
Weak content, hardly any tension, drags on.
Bad sound, mediocre action, little action..... x man-cheap version
Nix for me just badly tells the story.
Incredibly boring and not very entertaining.
I don't think that was! Story to the performance of the actors bad. Thumbs down!
By far the worst film from QT. Totally boring. Awkward dialogues. Ridiculous synchronization. Very bad. As if by a film student in the first semester
Was very disappointed with this film. The first 40 minutes or so the film takes place in a carriage and then in a log cabin and only blah blah blah. Except for the few insoles via pistol, this film can tip into the ton. I am very disappointed by Tarantino.
Mieser violent trashfilm.
One of the most pointless and worst movies I've ever seen. To come up with such a script, you have to be sick.
The plot consists of a senseless battle festival!
This was definitely my last attempt to warm up with Tarantino's excesses of violence. I can't see this impertinent, inhumane garbage anymore and now I give up.
Disgusting and full of boring never-ending dialogues. Actually, nothing happens for 3 hours. I have nothing against violence but it's just barren and in the days of Weinstein and George Floyd just not to look at it anymore. Leave it. Tarantino back and forth.
Pretty much talk and - well - boring story.
A boring, stupid, meaningless film. The music and the sound are horrible, but extremely loud. This is pure film art!
Even if it's a Tarantino movie, this film is completely meaningless, extremely brutal, in no way funny or original, and also completely boring. Complicating matters is the overlength of almost d r e i hours. I strongly advise against looking at this....!
It's like folk music, always the same melody structure with slightly altered lyrics. Sure, you can do that. But it's just predictable and boring.
Didn't have to pull me down. LANG u LANGWEILIG
It starts quite excitingly, but leads quite quickly into a senseless carnage. Could almost go through as a horror movie and is pure glorification of violence. Sick and pointless. Absolutely not recommended.
A film that seems to have originated from a morbid spirit.
The film has absolutely no story at all, everything is just delayed and shot around stupidly.
The film is boring. The stars are forced to discuss stupid dialogues. Disappointing.
A long-breathed, self-righteous, justification of murder, revenge, sadism and the death penalty, without a hidden deeper message. It's a real pity that film money is wasted on something like this.
Absolute waste of time.
Rarely seen such a nonsense! Habs switched off after half an hour. If only I had made sure that it was tarantino. In my opinion, it only produces nonsense. I really don't know why he's so successful. Well, maybe it's up to me....
An incredibly tough film, once again oversubscribed characters who are absolutely implausible and develop virtually no depth in the almost 3 hour long film. The brutality seems partly ridiculous and strongly reminiscent of splatter films...
Still seen in my life such a nonsense. Ridiculous blood spit... Talentless actors ... would have almost gone in the cinema at that time. I liked Django, but the fact that you can make money with such nonsense makes me stunned ... no story .. no tension ... Tarantino must retire.
Nothing happens! People keep saying that NOW must be something, and then there is nothing. Sure, something happens, but most of the time you just sit there and wonder why you can't do anything better with your time.
That I didn't fall asleep is everything, but it was almost before. Had to torment me until the end of the film because I thought there was something good to come.
Nothing happens, I nodded several times and still missed nothing. In a dialogue-heavy film, at least the same should be good. I was a Tarantino fan for the longest time.
We were very disappointed and didn't see the film to the end, it has nothing to do with West anymore, it's just away a carnage without proper content, but you don't have to understand everything.
I was really looking forward to the film and then had to whistle for over three hours of furious talk from boring guys stuck in a shop. Rarely seen such a scrap. Over three hours just doofes gesülze and the end doesn't make the boring plot any more good. For me, not only the worst film of Tarantino, but also one of the worst movies I've ever made. The fact that I paid for it really annoys me.
I borrowed the film LEIDER here. What a crap. The dialogues are more than meagre, they are scrap. With " Forward spooling " I managed only 30 min. I know tarantino movies, but this one is hugely beside it, really awful to watch. It seems to me like amateur theatre, and that's often better. Worse, I can't see anything like that, everything in me refuses. Very bad, name is not equal quality. In my opinion, this film is wasted time.
Long-winded, not funny, boring violence, partly predictable.
What a nonsense.
The worst Tarantino ever! Too long, too splatter, too predictable. I was hugely disappointed. I would like to have my money back and the life time.
Sad when a brilliant director makes more and more bad movies. It would be better to withdraw. Just shooting a splatter movie, with not even great dialogues, is just not enough anymore.
Unfortunately, the film is very simple. Good characters, but unfortunately the highlights are missing. I was bored at the beginning of the film because there are no highlights. We are used to this situation differently from this unique filmmaker! We wish you another thrilling movie like sincity & killbill! This hypnotizes me from start to finish!!!
After the third time the Blu-Ray could not be played anymore, or hangs every 5-10 min until you have to restart it completely...
You know that there is a lot of talk, but in the film it is exaggerated in my opinion. Have promised us more.
Borrowed the film for 99 cents. Too bad for the money. No tension, no surprise, no sense. And in the end, only death. Deadly boring.
From my point of view, a very, very, very, very slow story, in which the "voltage curve" builds up only slowly and the aha effect is completely absent. As one of those who appreciates this filmmaker, I'm more likely to make a damning judgment. Flop.
Partly very slow plot, had expected more action. Most of the film takes place in a single room.
Between a slumber and a sick rush of blood. The expression is the lowest drawer and so the film itself also acts. Really a pity around 0.99€
It was a torment to watch the film. Perhaps it is because of the translation, but the dialogues were barren. From halfway through, you think it's finally starting, but only a few people are brutally slammed.
This film is one of the most lame movies I've ever seen. It just doesn't happen, just stupid banter. And that's with such a long film. Have a little more to expect from the new Tarantino.
Probably one of the worst Tarantino movies I've ever seen. The plot is absolutely dull and long-winded. Thank God we haven't received the DVD in the store yet.
Bad. Kitschy images alternating with silent splatter and pointless dialogues. Guaranteed no cult. Levelless like "Hostel" and worse than Django.
I couldn't get anything out of the film, admittedly I wasn't very enthusiastic about Pulp Fiction either. In the end, you just ask yourself, "But why...?"
The film drags on infinitely. Besides, it is quite cheap for Tarantino, I would say (action, tension).
Lengthy. Not the best work. Somehow has no bump of the stripes. Too much 60s Western, without the necessary aha effect.
We haven't seen anything lame yet. Absolutely overpriced. You would have to get money. Pure boredom. Tired. Meaningless. Scrapy. Garbage.
Incredibly bad Tarantino. No details. But also characteristically pathetic, as Tim Roth tries to be Christoph Waltz. No matter. All bad.
Well, wasn't that great. Despite good cast. A look at it is enough. Tarantino stop. But he was better. Can only give one star, sorry. 
Just a disgrace. In all respects, this film is just rubbish. Format, dialogs, story, synchro just everything at the lowest level.
Very very boring. It doesn't happen for 1 1/2 hours. After that, even little. Against Django absolute loser. Hardly any action.
One of the worst movies I've seen so far. Where do I start. the plot is boring and the duration of more than 2.5 hours is clearly too long. It doesn't help to fill the cast with stars who occasionally shine in dialogues.
Such a corked cinema evening. Not worth seeing. The film is a handle on the toilet. Weak action a lot of talk. Everything takes place in the hut. Cheaply made film.
Rarely seen such a nonsense. Is not even worth the rental fee. Incomprehensible that such a great actor play in such a long-breathed absolutely meaningless movie. Doesn't even approach other QT movies.
Absolutely boring! I regret having paid money for it. I looked up to chapter three and then switched off then rather looked at something else.
I didn't like the film. For me, he was too bloodthirsty. There was also a kind of lack of a storyline. Everything was going towards the showdown and it was disappointing.
Wow, I wouldn't have guessed the movie so badly. Unfortunately not worth a penny. In hindsight, i am not surprised that it can already be bought after 11 months after the cinema release.
The film stretches like chewing gum. Dialogues that cause nothing but boredom. The script is just bad without suspense and esprit. For me, the worst Tarantino movie.
I expected so much, but it was really boring. The film stretches almost 3 hrs on a 15-minute story. Why? Very bad there is nothing more for star cast.
Totally boring; no action, bad pictures. Nothing happens for the first 1.5 hours! No comparison with movies like Django or Inglorious Bastards...
I would prefer not to give one at all! The 4 Euros were completely thrown out the window! I turned off after 20 minutes!
Although I like tarantino movies, I found the film brutal, bloody and long-winded. The film has many lengths and the "surprising" ending I found bland, unwitting and not particularly surprising. I advise my friends not to make the film.
So I haven't seen such a crap for a long time! Just insanely brutal scenes and boring dialogues! It's a pity for the money you're spending. I'm just glad I didn't go to the movies for this movie.
Very disappointing! Really promised me more of this movie! The actors are very good, but the story is extremely shallow! Lots of artificial blood. Well, whoever likes it, mine wasn't! Other movies of Tarantino I found better!
I really expected more; somehow inconsequential, saying nothing; so i will and I can not. I'm already disappointed. You have to pull yourself together very much to not fall asleep at times.
I actually like watching movies by Tarantino, but I've rarely seen such a cheap and unnecessarily brutal film. After an initial carriage ride, over 2 hours take place in a log cabin...
I'm so sorry, but the film drags on so long and there's so much rumbling that it's just not fun to watch it. Every design wears off at some point.
Little plot, easy story. I almost fell asleep in between, because so little has happened. Dialogues were even without the oblique wit of other Tarantino movies.
The worst Tarantino ever! Absolutely not recommended! Bored history, boring dialogues and no tension at all. It's not worth it!
Very very bad movie! It doesn't get any worse at all, such a dirt!!! I am totally disappointed! Just very bad!
Rarely seen such a bad movie. You expect something from the participants - every penny invested here was a real waste. Too bad for the lifetime spent. Even the actors didn't seem to feel like it anymore when they realized what they were doing.
This film is just macabre and the black humour is under the belt. For me, it was wasted time to watch the film.
Absolutely senseless nonsense. Without tension. I fell asleep after an hour. I still saw this idiotic carnage in the end. I can't understand that you can rate such a nonsense with 3 stars or even higher.
Although I'm a fan of Tarantino and the actors were great, I just found the film long-winded, boring, pointless and of perverse brutality. The latter may be the one or the other, but may he endure three hours of pointless chatter? Whoever likes it, let it be allowed, but for me it was complete scrap.
What must happen to a human being to have such brutal fantasies. Hopefully Tarantino will soon find a good psychologist to help him. I'm not a softie and like to watch action movies, but this senseless brutality of the images is incredible. The whole thing combined with extreme boredom makes 1 star.
A very boring movie! The only nice thing about the film was the winter landscape! You can save your time!
I find it regrettable that I have invested precious time of my life in this scrap. I don't even find a suitable word for this film.
Unfortunately, Tarantino's films are getting worse and worse. Endless dialogues, most of which are completely meaningless. No purchase recommendation for this weak Tarantino movie.
This is supposed to be a Tarantino movie? Boring, long-winded, nasty dialogues, bad casting. So if the film was by Til Schweiger, I would understand that, but Tarantino?
If the film was 1 hr shorter, you might be able to watch it. But even then, the story is extremely meaningless. A film you can skip.
Just disappointing. Perhaps with too high expectations. Boring sabbling, a completely predictable cheap punchline and an ever-delayed end.
More spectacularly expected. Figures well done but little action and too much singing. Not my case. Too bad for the money.
I found the film so creepy that I mostly pre-filled it so I didn't have to see the horror.
The songs are also in the German version in English, which is really disappointing. It wasn't the case in the cinema. I was so looking forward to the film.
What a crap.
The film was awful. Have turned off after 5min.
Don't buy or watch!!! I am horrified by the filmmakers and "actors" !!! I am happy to go to the cinema with my girlfriend, who is also a musical fan. We both were disappointed. The cats look like a failed laboratory experiment.
We didn't like the film except for a few scenes. The film consists of 95% dance and singing. A story wasn't really recognizable to us. Only the scenes with rebel Wilson were entertaining. We will not recommend the film.
It's a naughty thing..... We were so looking forward to the film, as we have already seen it in the cinema. But the song is bought through the store in English, but in the trailer on German. What is the crap supposed to do?
Unfortunately, they were very disappointed. Unfortunately not mine but is a matter of taste .... Original is still the much better thing for me.
Partly good approaches are overshadowed by weak, opaque, illogical scenes in which only the screenwriter can grasp what this film is really about. The dialogues are inappropriate and partly backed up with artificially created and bad accents. So bad and everything. So don't read any more here, but watch another movie!
Actually, I come from the IT sector, but I have no idea what I've just seen and I canceled the film after a little more than half. The story is confusing and the characters are flat and don't really harmonize with each other. You can see something about China, but that's also the only positive thing about the film!
Never seen a film like this, in which you have zero comma zero with the main actors. Very strangely filmed. The love story just ridiculous. Very long-winded film. If you could forgive zero stars, I would do it in this movie.
The film is barren, boring, not exciting and unnecessarily brutal in the depiction of the action scenes. The "IT scenes" are also very, very questionable. What remains is a shake of the head about the wasted lifetime to have watched the film to the end.
The director as well as some actors have amateur qualities. The story is good in principle but the implementation is totally bad. Thumbs down!
Despite the hard work of the cast, it was a very weak film. The plot from beginning to end (yes I actually persevered) implausible that it hurts.
Poor Chris. Probably the worst and most boring film. No recommendation. Lame plot boringtold. Unspectacular just yawn.... Cinema. Desolate
It's about as much about a 2-hour documentary about the nature of paper plates. This would probably have a better ending...
Mercilessly bad!!!
Extremely boring movie. There is no real tension. The way the good guys hack the NSA is ridiculous. 
A star is still very flattered. No tension, weak logic. One of the worst movies I've seen in recent years.
Neither gripping nor captivating. Yawning boring actors and a story from which you could have made so much more. No recommendation.
It's the sequel to 'Keep You Awake' Part 2... I didn't like this movie. The trailer looks interesting, but that's it!
Boring! I couldn't do anything with this film at all. I've been tormented by the film in the hope that it will eventually be good. But it didn't happen. The actors were so lame and the mood too depressed.
Incredibly bad. You really can't think of more about the film. The plot is a joke. The logic was not even tried and the main actor disqualifies himself in front of a running hand-held camera.
Those who suffer from insomnia and restlessness are well served with this medicine. This film is so exciting that every patient falls into a coma after at least a quarter of an hour. Perhaps an anaesthetist has helped the director with advice and deeds!
I would only be interested to know where the budget of 70 million!!! has remained?!? It looks like the film was shot with a cheap camcorder... I watch a lot of movies, but this has been the worst for a long time!
The story is boring and poorly implemented. As was said earlier in school: the subject was missed, absolute nonsense...
Pulls unbelievably and I got really bored while looking. The trailer promises something the movie can't keep!
Rarely has I seen such a nasty film and I've seen a lot, but it was by far the worst. By far even with mulled wine not tolerable!!
Another US film whose absolutely stupid staging and plot is surpassed only by its one-dimensional and unsympathetic characters. An absolute work.
Don't watch the movie. Poorly thought out, poorly done and 100% predictable. I think you'd better spend your time with something more meaningful.
Honestly, what a bullshit. Unfortunately, I can't think of any more. Rather watch ne doku or something or go out. Everything is better than this film.
Cheap story, poorly filmed, transparent plot. The state must resort to an inmate to catch the hacker? Is mur bad..
Long-winded, wooden, predictable, partly clichéd, poor cinematography, flat and unfinished characters, incoherent or incomprehensible storyline - summed up an all-round bad film due to an underground script.
I think Chris Hemsworth is great, but in this film he's probably misplaced. Although... the whole film is unfortunately not convincing. Boring, long-winded, unnecessarily brutal and somehow I had the feeling all the time that the director himself didn't know exactly where he wanted to go with his story. Too bad, because hacker movies can be really exciting and cool. But it definitely wasn't. Is also not hacked enough...
The announcement gives hope for an exciting film, but unfortunately you will be disappointed. Very long-winded film without great highlights, predictable and also boring, since nothing happens forever. Very bad about a wasted evening.
Just boring and unrealistic film. No real connections or anything else. I feel a bit like I've been watching a movie made by a couple of kids with a mobile phone.
Here nothing fits together, story scrubbed, camera scrubbed, grotesque actors, incomprehensible development of the persons (and their relationship with each other). I've looked at a lot of crap, but it was so bad that I wrote my first Amazon movie review.
The film is barren, boring, not exciting, the actors bad. The main actor was chosen incorrectly, you don't take away the PC hacking knowledge. The action scenes are just bad. The "finale" is so stupid that I wondered if the director shot the scenes in full rush.
Unfortunately, I decided to watch this film. The story is neither interesting, exciting or logical. A few action scenes, a bit of slackon on keyboards and dialogues to fall asleep. Who only writes such scripts and then also shoots them. Waste.
What a pity. Fade story, predictable, flat humour.
I was expecting a funny movie for the whole family. But the least was to laugh. Unfortunately no purchase recommendation. Pets and Zoomania play in a completely different league.
Unfortunately, the film did not convince us, even with a little smile we can not recommend the film any further. It's a real shame.
Very weak and flat story that is transparent from the beginning. The characters are well animated, but have neither wit nor personality! In short: No purchase recommendation if you want to laugh.
Had to stop again and again in between. Then look further in the hope that something interesting will still happen. But the movie is just terribly boring.
I thought it must be a good movie with this cast, but after 10 minutes of boring and horrible singing, I had to switch off. I like to watch Bollywood movies, there are also sung often and long, but that jaule here in the film is just not to endure.
Unfortunately not at all my taste. The plot is only faintly visible. Otherwise, people dance all the time. I'd rather watch a real musical. Not suitable as a film.
I expected more from this film. Unfortunately, it has to be judged to be disappointing.
Don't understand why he won so many Oscars. Switched off after 20 minutes.
Extremely much singing, hardly any action, far too exaggerated and unrealistic, a pity!
This film is not worth seeing - honestly. I can't understand how he won the Oscar at all. The whole movie is without climax and actually boring!
Film slaps there without depth and highlights. Music quite neat. What so many Oscars for?
One of the worst movies I've ever seen. The film has no plot for me. The romance seems very set. It's a love story. I thought that if the whole movie is already bad, at least the ending is beautiful. However, this is a misrepresentation.
Wouldn't even give a star. Really bad movie, I turned it off in the middle of it. Really a pity. Not recommended!
The movie is just crap. Don't understand how to distribute Oscars here. Maybe they just wanted to throw something so that the actors would disappear. Those who like musicals will only be disappointed here. Sorry.
The film is a good example of milking a dead cow. An attempt is made to squeeze some money out of the film series. Unfortunately really bad.. Cheap jokes and predictable story.
A completely superfluous, predictable, grotto-long badly played slap in the face of the first two films in the series... Absolutely not new to see here...
Unfortunately, not much remains of the initial magic and comedy. The special effects don't tear that away any more. What a pity.
Very good special effects but the story bland and the acting skills of Mr. Depp are outstandingly bad in contrast to the other parts.
That's scrap... I wonder which investor financed this film... No story, the common thread is missing and mainly effects! Boring and unnecessary!
With every part that came along, the movies got worse.
If you think parts 3 and 4 were already bad, then you haven't seen it yet. There are a few places here and there where you can laugh, but in terms of action, it's all very questionable. Please do not !!!!!!! any further part
Worst part so far. I was so looking forward to it. Story is sucked out. Boring, long-winded, not as funny as you're used to. Unfortunately, it is not recommended at all.
Nothing new at all. Everything that worked in the previous movies has been built in. There is no tension, because you always know exactly that Jack is getting out of the situation.
The worst part of the series. Like Indiana Jones, the last part would have been better saved! So it tarnishes the overall impression very much.
Of all parts by far the worst. But if you want to see the complete "Curse of the Caribbean" series, it's ok.
You can spare yourself that! No story, bad actors - unfortunately the reviews read have been confirmed, you can not recommend...
Boring from start to finish. We were very disappointed because we were looking forward to the second part because of the great first Ant-Man.
Unfortunately, this film is by far the worst Marvel film of all time. The story is boring and predictable, the characters played poorly, the special effects almost non-existent or based only on switches between small and big "super" heroes. Only Michael Douglas and Michelle Pfeiffer were able to convince.
Here is another thing: Disney prefers to launch dozens of Marvel film adaptations and they are getting worse and worse, the first part was great and if it hadn't appeared, you wouldn't have missed it.
Unfortunately, totally thin story, predictable and pathetic.
Where was the difference to the last movies (except the fourth part)? The next film could simply be cut from the last ones. An exciting plot is apparently dispensed with anyway.
Useless long action sequences envelop a chewed story
wow, the last part is so fabulously miserable. All predictable.
Actually, I couldn't see any significant story. So the action gets boring quite quickly. I will avoid further sequels from Bourne.
Well what to say, the plot is told in 3 movements and the rest of the time is filled with overlong chase scenes. Schade i am actually a fan of this film series and thought at the end of the film surprised, how that was all? Perhaps the story has slowly worn out or expectations have changed. Who knows..
The movie is ok, but unfortunately the picture and sound is just bad. I bought it because I still know him from ZDF and had him well remembered, but here on DVD you really built crap. Too bad for the film!!!
This film is not worth the time, totally kitschy and flat plot. How can so many good actors accept such a bad script? I prefer to watch my dishwasher. One of the worst movies we've ever seen.
Well, what should I write? The film is boring until it doesn't go any more. So you can really save your time. It's a pity where the actors aren't bad at all and the plot would have been more good. But so here is the first 1 star rating.
The film lasts over 2 hours, for the fact that the plot very rarely gets exciting. In addition, the film is sometimes difficult to understand and very far from reality.
I don't understand how to find this movie good! First of all, it drags on infinitely long, in terms of content total nonsense: the simplest things do not work, but the impossible ones, of course. The superhero had to be explained a wormhole with the help of a sheet of paper. Short, pathetic performance by Matt Damon. All nasty kitsch. And the film music is still stolen (Philip Glass). REAL WASTE OF TIME.
Was just as entertaining as if I had looked at a wall! No tension, no joke, no sense.
For me, this is the worst film in the field!!!! I don't think I've managed to watch Interstellar until the end! Too bad for my time!!! I think it just arrived on my watch news.... Yes! Run!!!! Turn off!!!!
A rarely stupid film; First-class actors, but absurd story.
This film is just boring and overly long on so many levels. Just bad. From the running fridge bot to infinity and much further.
Due to positive reviews from friends, I was looking forward to the film. Unfortunately not right! The film starts promisingly, but then mutates into what I think is an extremely boring and poorly executed drama! I can only speak for myself here and I haven't seen anything worse for a long time. Sound and image quality were OK, hence my verdict 1 star.
So.... this film was really indescribably bad. And it's definitely NOT because I was too "stupid" to understand him..... The plot sometimes jumps back and forth completely confused and is completely incomprehensible. The dialogues are something of a flat and the actors involved have already played much better roles. Even the said great special effects and space shots don't rip that out anymore. Don't spend any money on it! Hands off!
No idea what dimension you have to be in to make the film !?! The bookshelf? Oh no, that's not possible. Now at the latest is time to switch off...
I'm glad I didn't go to the movies for the movie. Worse movie. One that causes bad mood. Even after half an hour, we only watched it in a quick run.
It's great how much the film can explain. Pretty much nothing was explained in tell, except that love is supposed to be the explanation/solution for everything. Many people do not even know that love is a physical entity.
If this film had been cut by half and the story was told a little more comprehensible and interesting, you could watch it - this film here is an absolute waste of time, cheaply tinkered with in the studio with infinite lengths...
Very tough plot, sometimes even really sleepy and boring. The effects are very well illustrated, but sometimes there is a lack of reality
This film doesn't make any sense at all. It was not worth spending the money on it. I can't recommend it.
Who likes to wait for hours for what will happen without what will love him. I almost fell asleep and was very happy that we weren't in the cinema for that.
So for my feeling just too much information, I could not follow at times, confused story..... unfortunately a flop for me!
For the first few minutes of the film I still had hope for a nice movie evening. Unfortunately, he slowed down a lot afterwards!
You can't call this movie that. It is a clash of individual excerpts of supposed surveillance cameras and television interviews with no real connection. The temporal jumps prevent the story and a possible arc of tension from building up. In my opinion, the purchase of this film was money thrown out.
As a science fiction fan who has a little idea of physics, I'm mega disappointed! Great pictures yes, but that's it. For people who have some idea of gravity etc have totally unsuitable, because the mistakes are very clear! Luckily, I had only borrowed the film.
I can clearly agree with all the reviews here who find this movie weak, boring or similar without further consent. As of today, it is not part of the Purge series for me, but is a film that no longer really has anything to do with it.
Worst part. Uncomprehensible actions of the individual persons. The plot around the character Skelleton was, in my opinion, pointless and didn't fit at all.
I turned off the movie after 20 minutes... the plot is far too confusing.
One of the most tense "blockbuster movies". Despite good and well-known actors/ inside, the film remains tension-free from start to finish. The dramatic music doesn't really help much.
Watching this film to the end is torture: the worst production I have in my many videos. Permanent dominating and oversounding music prevents you from hearing or perceiving the dialogues correctly. There is no communication without any disturbing noise!
Another scrap movie with DiCaprio, made after 30min. Creepy.
Complex movies and thinking along nicely and well - but when I sit in front of the TV for the first half hour and don't see anything at all, I turn off, quite simply.
I went through half the film, then enough. Always the same lyre - the stupid nerd who is there for amusement, the bad guys who want to market the dinosaurs, the good guys who want to save the dinosaurs. Lots of noise and dinosaur roar, in between the sacrificial care of the favorite raptor to the embarrassment pain limit. The only good thing was the optics. But since you've seen everything before, that's not enough to stick to the movie. I think the issue of Jurassic Park has finally been sucked out.
This movie hangs every few seconds and you can't watch it. It looks like he's going to have to load, but even after 1h of charging he still didn't work.
Something between horrible and cruel. Thank God I spared myself the drama in the cinema. This soooo big announced blockbuster can be confidently gifted
So boring. Why is something like this written? Should be available in the pharmacy as a strong sleeping pill. Prescription. Word, word, word. End.
I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone who wants to treat themselves to a relaxed reading book. The descriptions and information that one receives from the book is very condensed and there is no scenario in your head based on the sparse descriptions of the situation, so that one cannot speak of any colorful reading pleasure.
For my taste, "Man of Steel" is as far away from Superman as possible. Strange appearances and excessive lypnosing action and CGI.
A completely superfluous book, which I wondered when I read it, how an author develops such a "dirty" fantasy just to sell books and make money from them. It would be better to write about beautiful things.
If I couldn't forgive a star, I would do it... long-winded, set up, staged, artificial, implausible, and an end so stupid that one would like to mourn the 379 wasted pages until then. I don't think I've ever read a worse book than this one. An absolute disappointment!
Each book follows the same pattern. Only the place changes. Just embarrassing. After the contract killer crashed into the depths again, as in every book, I decided to put the bad book away. Instead of buying this book, you prefer to donate the money to the needy. Just a very bad book.
Bad book I've ever read. Had promised me more, as it was praised everywhere. Here it proves once again, the more advertising, the more necessary the article has. Money thrown out for me.
